Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1084.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Repeal Sections 9-500.39 and 11-269.17, Arizona Revised Statutes, are repealed. Sec. 2. Section 42-2003, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE42-2003. Authorized disclosure of confidential information A. Confidential information relating to: 1. A taxpayer may be disclosed to the taxpayer, its successor in interest or a designee of the taxpayer who is authorized in writing by the taxpayer. A principal corporate officer of a parent corporation may execute a written authorization for a controlled subsidiary. If a taxpayer elects to file an Arizona small business income tax return under section 43-302, a written authorization by the taxpayer to allow the department to disclose personal income tax information to a designee includes the corresponding Arizona small business income tax return. 2. A corporate taxpayer may be disclosed to any principal officer, any person designated by a principal officer or any person designated in a resolution by the corporate board of directors or other similar governing body. If a corporate officer signs a statement under penalty of perjury representing that the officer is a principal officer, the department may rely on the statement until the statement is shown to be false. For the purposes of this paragraph, "principal officer" includes a chief executive officer, president, secretary, treasurer, vice president of tax, chief financial officer, chief operating officer or chief tax officer or any other corporate officer who has the authority to bind the taxpayer on matters related to state taxes. 3. A partnership may be disclosed to any partner of the partnership.  This exception does not include disclosure of confidential information of a particular partner unless otherwise authorized. 4. A limited liability company may be disclosed to any member of the company or, if the company is manager-managed, to any manager. 5. An estate may be disclosed to the personal representative of the estate and to any heir, next of kin or beneficiary under the will of the decedent if the department finds that the heir, next of kin or beneficiary has a material interest that will be affected by the confidential information. 6. A trust may be disclosed to the trustee or trustees, jointly or separately, and to the grantor or any beneficiary of the trust if the department finds that the grantor or beneficiary has a material interest that will be affected by the confidential information. 7. A government entity may be disclosed to the head of the entity or a member of the governing board of the entity, or any employee of the entity who has been delegated the authorization in writing by the head of the entity or the governing board of the entity. 8. Any taxpayer may be disclosed if the taxpayer has waived any rights to confidentiality either in writing or on the record in any administrative or judicial proceeding. 9. The name and taxpayer identification numbers of persons issued direct payment permits may be publicly disclosed. 10. Any taxpayer may be disclosed during a meeting or telephone call if the taxpayer is present during the meeting or telephone call and authorizes the disclosure of confidential information. B. Confidential information may be disclosed to: 1. Any employee of the department whose official duties involve tax administration. 2. The office of the attorney general solely for its use in preparation for, or in an investigation that may result in, any proceeding involving tax administration before the department or any other agency or board of this state, or before any grand jury or any state or federal court. 3. The department of liquor licenses and control for its use in determining whether a spirituous liquor licensee has paid all transaction privilege taxes and affiliated excise taxes incurred as a result of the sale of spirituous liquor, as defined in section 4-101, at the licensed establishment and imposed on the licensed establishments by this state and its political subdivisions. 4. Other state tax officials whose official duties require the disclosure for proper tax administration purposes if the information is sought in connection with an investigation or any other proceeding conducted by the official.  Any disclosure is limited to information of a taxpayer who is being investigated or who is a party to a proceeding conducted by the official. 5. The following agencies, officials and organizations, if they grant substantially similar privileges to the department for the type of information being sought, pursuant to statute and a written agreement between the department and the foreign country, agency, state, Indian tribe or organization: (a) The United States internal revenue service, alcohol and tobacco tax and trade bureau of the United States treasury, United States bureau of alcohol, tobacco, firearms and explosives of the United States department of justice, United States drug enforcement agency and federal bureau of investigation. (b) A state tax official of another state. (c) An organization of states, federation of tax administrators or multistate tax commission that operates an information exchange for tax administration purposes. (d) An agency, official or organization of a foreign country with responsibilities that are comparable to those listed in subdivision (a), (b) or (c) of this paragraph. (e) An agency, official or organization of an Indian tribal government with responsibilities comparable to the responsibilities of the agencies, officials or organizations identified in subdivision (a), (b) or (c) of this paragraph. 6. The auditor general, in connection with any audit of the department subject to the restrictions in section 42-2002, subsection D. 7. Any person to the extent necessary for effective tax administration in connection with: (a) The processing, storage, transmission, destruction and reproduction of the information. (b) The programming, maintenance, repair, testing and procurement of equipment for purposes of tax administration. (c) The collection of the taxpayer's civil liability. 8. The office of administrative hearings relating to taxes administered by the department pursuant to section 42-1101, but the department shall not disclose any confidential information without the taxpayer's written consent: (a) Regarding income tax or withholding tax. (b) On any tax issue relating to information associated with the reporting of income tax or withholding tax. 9. The United States treasury inspector general for tax administration for the purpose of reporting a violation of internal revenue code section 7213A (26 United States Code section 7213A), unauthorized inspection of returns or return information. 10. The financial management service of the United States treasury department for use in the treasury offset program. 11. The United States treasury department or its authorized agent for use in the state income tax levy program and in the electronic federal tax payment system. 12. The Arizona commerce authority for its use in: (a) Qualifying renewable energy operations for the tax incentives under section 42-12006. (b) Qualifying businesses with a qualified facility for income tax credits under sections 43-1083.03 and 43-1164.04. (c) Fulfilling its annual reporting responsibility pursuant to section 41-1512, subsections U and V and section 41-1517, subsection L. (d) Certifying computer data centers for tax relief under section 41-1519. (e) Certifying applicants for the tax credit for motion picture production costs under sections 43-1082 and 43-1165. 13. A prosecutor for purposes of section 32-1164, subsection C. 14. The office of the state fire marshal for use in determining compliance with and enforcing title 37, chapter 9, article 5. 15. The department of transportation for its use in administering taxes, surcharges and penalties prescribed by title 28. 16. The Arizona health care cost containment system administration for its use in administering nursing facility provider assessments. 17. The department of administration risk management division and the office of the attorney general if the information relates to a claim against this state pursuant to section 12-821.01 involving the department of revenue. 18. Another state agency if the taxpayer authorizes the disclosure of confidential information in writing, including an authorization that is part of an application form or other document submitted to the agency. 19. The department of economic security for its use in determining whether an employer has paid all amounts due under the unemployment insurance program pursuant to title 23, chapter 4. 20. The department of health services for its use in determining the following: (a) Whether a medical marijuana dispensary is in compliance with the tax requirements of chapter 5 of this title for the purposes of section 36-2806, subsection A. (b) Whether a marijuana establishment, marijuana testing facility or dual licensee licensed under title 36, chapter 28.2 is in compliance with the tax obligations under this title or title 43. 21. The Arizona department of agriculture for the purpose of ascertaining compliance with the licensing provisions in title 3. 22. The office of economic opportunity for the purpose of performing the duties and obligations to or on behalf of this state prescribed by title 41, chapter 53. C. Confidential information may be disclosed in any state or federal judicial or administrative proceeding pertaining to tax administration pursuant to the following conditions: 1. One or more of the following circumstances must apply: (a) The taxpayer is a party to the proceeding. (b) The proceeding arose out of, or in connection with, determining the taxpayer's civil or criminal liability, or the collection of the taxpayer's civil liability, with respect to any tax imposed under this title or title 43. (c) The treatment of an item reflected on the taxpayer's return is directly related to the resolution of an issue in the proceeding. (d) Return information directly relates to a transactional relationship between a person who is a party to the proceeding and the taxpayer and directly affects the resolution of an issue in the proceeding. 2. Confidential information may not be disclosed under this subsection if the disclosure is prohibited by section 42-2002, subsection C or D. D. Identity information may be disclosed for purposes of notifying persons entitled to tax refunds if the department is unable to locate the persons after reasonable effort. E. The department, on the request of any person, shall provide the names and addresses of bingo licensees as defined in section 5-401, verify whether or not a person has a privilege license and number, a tobacco product distributor's license and number or a withholding license and number or disclose the information to be posted on the department's website or otherwise publicly accessible pursuant to section 42-1124, subsection F and section 42-3401. F. A department employee, in connection with the official duties relating to any audit, collection activity or civil or criminal investigation, may disclose return information to the extent that disclosure is necessary to obtain information that is not otherwise reasonably available. These official duties include the correct determination of and liability for tax, the amount to be collected or the enforcement of other state tax revenue laws. G. Confidential information relating to transaction privilege tax, use tax, severance tax, jet fuel excise and use tax and any other tax collected by the department on behalf of any jurisdiction may be disclosed to any county, city or town tax official if the information relates to a taxpayer who is or may be taxable by a county, city or town or who may be subject to audit by the department pursuant to section 42-6002. Any taxpayer information that is released by the department to the county, city or town: 1. May be used only for internal purposes, including audits and communication with taxpayers for the purposes of the notice required by section 9-499.15, subsection C. If there is a legitimate business need relating to enforcing laws, regulations and ordinances pursuant to section 9-500.39 or 11-269.17, a county, city or town tax official may redisclose transaction privilege tax information relating to a vacation rental or short-term rental property owner or online lodging operator from the new license report and license update report, subject to the following: (a) The information redisclosed is limited to the following: (i) The transaction privilege tax license number. (ii) The type of organization or ownership of the business. (iii) The legal business name and doing business as name, if different from the legal name. (iv) The business mailing address, tax record physical location address, telephone number, email address and fax number. (v) The date the business started in this state, the business description and the North American industry classification system code. (vi) The name, address and telephone number for each owner, partner, corporate officer, member, managing member or official of the employing unit. (b) Redisclosure is limited to nonelected officials in other units within the county, city or town. The information may not be redisclosed to an elected official or the elected official's staff. (c) All redisclosures of confidential information made pursuant to this paragraph are subject to paragraph 2 of this subsection. 2. May not be disclosed to the public in any manner that does not comply with confidentiality standards established by the department. The county, city or town shall agree in writing with the department that any release of confidential information that violates the confidentiality standards adopted by the department will result in the immediate suspension of any rights of the county, city or town to receive taxpayer information under this subsection. H. The department may disclose statistical information gathered from confidential information if it does not disclose confidential information attributable to any one taxpayer.  The department may disclose statistical information gathered from confidential information, even if it discloses confidential information attributable to a taxpayer, to: 1. The state treasurer in order to comply with the requirements of section 42-5029, subsection A, paragraph 3. 2. The joint legislative income tax credit review committee, the joint legislative budget committee staff and the legislative staff in order to comply with the requirements of section 43-221. I. The department may disclose the aggregate amounts of any tax credit, tax deduction or tax exemption enacted after January 1, 1994. Information subject to disclosure under this subsection shall not be disclosed if a taxpayer demonstrates to the department that such information would give an unfair advantage to competitors. J. Except as provided in section 42-2002, subsection C, confidential information, described in section 42-2001, paragraph 1, subdivision (a), item (ii), may be disclosed to law enforcement agencies for law enforcement purposes. K. The department may provide transaction privilege tax license information to property tax officials in a county for the purpose of identification and verification of the tax status of commercial property. L. The department may provide transaction privilege tax, luxury tax, use tax, property tax and severance tax information to the ombudsman-citizens aide pursuant to title 41, chapter 8, article 5. M. Except as provided in section 42-2002, subsection D, a court may order the department to disclose confidential information pertaining to a party to an action.  An order shall be made only on a showing of good cause and that the party seeking the information has made demand on the taxpayer for the information. N. This section does not prohibit the disclosure by the department of any information or documents submitted to the department by a bingo licensee.  Before disclosing the information, the department shall obtain the name and address of the person requesting the information. O. If the department is required or allowed to disclose confidential information, it may charge the person or agency requesting the information for the reasonable cost of its services. P. Except as provided in section 42-2002, subsection D, the department of revenue shall release confidential information as requested by the department of economic security pursuant to section 42-1122 or 46-291. Information disclosed under this subsection is limited to the same type of information that the United States internal revenue service is authorized to disclose under section 6103(l)(6) of the internal revenue code. Q. Except as provided in section 42-2002, subsection D, the department shall release confidential information as requested by the courts and clerks of the court pursuant to section 42-1122. R. To comply with the requirements of section 42-5031, the department may disclose to the state treasurer, to the county stadium district board of directors and to any city or town tax official that is part of the county stadium district confidential information attributable to a taxpayer's business activity conducted in the county stadium district. S. The department shall release to the attorney general confidential information as requested by the attorney general for purposes of determining compliance with or enforcing any of the following: 1. Any public health control law relating to tobacco sales as provided under title 36, chapter 6, article 14. 2. Any law relating to reduced cigarette ignition propensity standards as provided under title 37, chapter 9, article 5. 3. Sections 44-7101 and 44-7111, the master settlement agreement referred to in those sections and all agreements regarding disputes under the master settlement agreement. T. For proceedings before the department, the office of administrative hearings, the state board of tax appeals or any state or federal court involving penalties that were assessed against a return preparer, an electronic return preparer or a payroll service company pursuant to section 42-1103.02, 42-1125.01 or 43-419, confidential information may be disclosed only before the judge or administrative law judge adjudicating the proceeding, the parties to the proceeding and the parties' representatives in the proceeding prior to its introduction into evidence in the proceeding. The confidential information may be introduced as evidence in the proceeding only if the taxpayer's name, the names of any dependents listed on the return, all social security numbers, the taxpayer's address, the taxpayer's signature and any attachments containing any of the foregoing information are redacted and if either: 1. The treatment of an item reflected on such a return is or may be related to the resolution of an issue in the proceeding. 2. Such a return or the return information relates or may relate to a transactional relationship between a person who is a party to the proceeding and the taxpayer that directly affects the resolution of an issue in the proceeding. 3. The method of payment of the taxpayer's withholding tax liability or the method of filing the taxpayer's withholding tax return is an issue for the period. U. The department and attorney general may share the information specified in subsection S of this section with any of the following: 1. Federal, state or local agencies located in this state for the purposes of enforcement of the statutes or agreements specified in subsection S of this section or for the purposes of enforcement of corresponding laws of other states. 2. Indian tribes located in this state for the purposes of enforcement of the statutes or agreements specified in subsection S of this section. 3. A court, arbitrator, data clearinghouse or similar entity for the purpose of assessing compliance with or making calculations required by the master settlement agreement or agreements regarding disputes under the master settlement agreement, and with counsel for the parties or expert witnesses in any such proceeding, if the information otherwise remains confidential. V. The department may provide the name and address of qualifying hospitals and qualifying health care organizations, as defined in section 42-5001, to a business that is classified and reporting transaction privilege tax under the utilities classification. W. The department may disclose to an official of any city, town or county in a current agreement or considering a prospective agreement with the department as described in section 42-5032.02, subsection G any information relating to amounts that are subject to distribution and that are required by section 42-5032.02. Information disclosed by the department under this subsection: 1. May be used only by the city, town or county for internal purposes. 2. May not be disclosed to the public in any manner that does not comply with confidentiality standards established by the department. The city, town or county must agree with the department in writing that any release of confidential information that violates the confidentiality standards will result in the immediate suspension of any rights of the city, town or county to receive information under this subsection. X. Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the department may not disclose information provided by an online lodging marketplace, as defined in section 42-5076, without the written consent of the online lodging marketplace, and the information may be disclosed only pursuant to subsection A, paragraphs 1 through 6, 8 and 10, subsection B, paragraphs 1, 2, 7 and 8 and subsections C, D and G of this section.  Such information: 1. Is not subject to disclosure pursuant to title 39, relating to public records. 2. May not be disclosed to any agency of this state or of any county, city, town or other political subdivision of this state. END_STATUTE Sec. 3. Section 42-5005, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE42-5005. Transaction privilege tax and municipal privilege tax licenses; fees; renewal; revocation; violation; classification A. Every person who receives gross proceeds of sales or gross income on which a transaction privilege tax is imposed by this article and who desires to engage or continue in business shall apply to the department for an annual transaction privilege tax license accompanied by a fee of $12. A person shall not engage or continue in business until the person has obtained a transaction privilege tax license. B. A person desiring to engage or continue in business within a city or town that imposes a municipal privilege tax shall apply to the department of revenue for an annual municipal privilege tax license accompanied by a fee of up to $50, as established by ordinance of the city or town. The person shall submit the fee with each new license application.  The person may not engage or continue in business until the person has obtained a municipal privilege tax license.  The department must collect, hold, pay and manage the fees in trust for the city or town and may not use the monies for any other purposes.  The fee imposed by this subsection does not apply to a marketplace facilitator or remote seller that is only required to obtain a transaction privilege tax license pursuant to section 42-5043. C. A transaction privilege tax license is valid only for the calendar year in which it is issued, but it may be renewed for the following calendar year. There is no fee for the renewal of the transaction privilege tax license. The transaction privilege tax license must be renewed at the same time and in the manner as the municipal privilege tax license renewal. D. A municipal privilege tax license is valid only for the calendar year in which it is issued, but it may be renewed for the following calendar year by the payment of paying a license renewal fee of up to not more than $50. The renewal fee is due and payable on January 1 and is considered delinquent if not received on or before the last business day of January.  The department must collect, hold, pay and manage the fees in trust for the city or town and may not use the monies for any other purposes. The renewal fee imposed by this subsection does not apply to a marketplace facilitator or remote seller that is only required to obtain a transaction privilege tax license pursuant to section 42-5043. E. A licensee that remains in business after the municipal privilege tax license has expired is subject to the payment of the license renewal fee and the civil penalty prescribed in section 42-1125, subsection R. F. If the applicant is not in arrears in payment of any tax imposed by this article, the department shall issue a license authorizing the applicant to engage and continue in business on the condition that the applicant complies with this article. The license number shall be continuous. G. The transaction privilege tax license and the municipal privilege tax license are not transferable on a complete change of ownership or change of location of the business. For the purposes of this subsection: 1. "Location" means the business address appearing in the application for the license and on the transaction privilege tax or municipal privilege tax license. 2. "Ownership" means any right, title or interest in the business. 3. "Transferable" means the ability to convey or change the right or privilege to engage or continue in business by virtue of the issuance of the transaction privilege tax or municipal privilege tax license. H. When the ownership or location of a business on which a transaction privilege tax or municipal privilege tax is imposed has been changed within the meaning of subsection G of this section, the licensee shall surrender the license to the department. The license shall be reissued to the new owners or for the new location on application by the taxpayer and payment of the $12 fee for a transaction privilege tax license and a fee of up to $50 per jurisdiction for a municipal privilege tax license. The department must collect, hold, pay and manage the fees in trust for the city or town and may not use the monies for any other purposes. I. A person who is engaged in or conducting a business in two or more locations or under two or more business names shall procure a transaction privilege tax license for each location or business name regardless of whether all locations or business names are reported on a consolidated return under a single transaction privilege tax license number. This requirement shall not be construed as conflicting with section 42-5020. J. A person who is engaged in or conducting a business in two or more locations or under two or more business names shall procure a municipal privilege tax license for each location or business name regardless of whether all locations or business names are reported on a consolidated return. K. A person who is engaged in or conducting business at two or more locations or under two or more business names and who files a consolidated return under a single transaction privilege tax license number as provided by section 42-5020 is required to pay only a single municipal privilege tax license renewal fee for each local jurisdiction pursuant to subsection D of this section.  A person who is engaged in or conducting business at two or more locations or under two or more business names and who does not file a consolidated return under a single license number is required to pay a license renewal fee for each location or license in a local jurisdiction. L. For the purposes of this chapter and chapter 6 of this title: 1. Through December 31, 2018, an online lodging marketplace, as defined in section 42-5076, may register with the department for a license for the payment of taxes levied by this state and one or more counties, cities, towns or special taxing districts, at the election of the online lodging marketplace, for taxes due from an online lodging operator on any online lodging transaction facilitated by the online lodging marketplace, subject to sections 42-5076 and 42-6009. 2. Beginning from and after December 31, 2018, an online lodging marketplace, as defined in section 42-5076, shall register with the department for a license for the payment of taxes levied by this state and one or more counties, cities, towns or special taxing districts for taxes due from an online lodging operator on any online lodging transaction facilitated by the online lodging marketplace, subject to sections 42-5076 and 42-6009. M. For the purposes of this chapter and chapter 6 of this title, a person who is licensed pursuant to title 32, chapter 20 and who files an electronic consolidated tax return for individual real properties under management on behalf of the property owners may be licensed with the department for the payment of taxes levied by this state and by any county, city or town with respect to those properties. There is no fee for a license issued pursuant to this subsection. N. l. For the purposes of this chapter, a peer-to-peer car sharing program shall register with the department for a license for the payment of taxes levied by this state and one or more counties, cities, towns or special districts for taxes due from a shared vehicle owner on any shared vehicle transaction facilitated by the peer-to-peer car sharing program, subject to the limitations in section 28-9616. A peer-to-peer car sharing program shall remit the surcharges established pursuant to sections 5-839 and 48-4234 only if the peer-to-peer car sharing program allows shared vehicle transactions that involve a vehicle for which the shared vehicle owner has not certified to the department pursuant to section 28-9616, subsection C that it is an individual-owned shared vehicle. For the purposes of this subsection, "individual-owned shared vehicle", "peer-to-peer car sharing program", "shared vehicle owner" and "shared vehicle transaction" have the same meanings prescribed in section 28-9601. O. m. If a person violates this article or any rule adopted under this article, the department upon hearing may revoke any transaction privilege tax or municipal privilege tax license issued to the person.  The department shall provide ten days' written notice of the hearing, stating the time and place and requiring the person to appear and show cause why the license or licenses should not be revoked. The department shall provide written notice to the person of the revocation of the license.  The notices may be served personally or by mail pursuant to section 42-5037.  After revocation, the department shall not issue a new license to the person unless the person presents evidence satisfactory to the department that the person will comply with this article and with the rules adopted under this article.  The department may prescribe the terms under which a revoked license may be reissued. P. n. The department may revoke any transaction privilege tax or municipal privilege tax license issued to any person who fails for thirteen consecutive months to make and file a return required by this article on or before the due date or the due date as extended by the department unless the failure is due to a reasonable cause and not due to wilful neglect. Q. o. A person who violates any provision of this section is guilty of a class 3 misdemeanor. END_STATUTE Sec. 4. Section 42-5009, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE42-5009. Certificates establishing deductions; liability for making false certificate; tax exclusion; definitions A. A person who conducts any business classified under article 2 of this chapter may establish entitlement to the allowable deductions from the tax base of that business by both: 1. Marking the invoice for the transaction to indicate that the gross proceeds of sales or gross income derived from the transaction was deducted from the tax base. 2. Obtaining a certificate executed by the purchaser indicating the name and address of the purchaser, the precise nature of the business of the purchaser, the purpose for which the purchase was made, the necessary facts to establish the appropriate deduction and the tax license number of the purchaser to the extent the deduction depends on the purchaser conducting business classified under article 2 of this chapter and a certification that the person executing the certificate is authorized to do so on behalf of the purchaser. The certificate may be disregarded if the seller has reason to believe that the information contained in the certificate is not accurate or complete. B. A person who does not comply with subsection A of this section may establish entitlement to the deduction by presenting facts necessary to support the entitlement, but the burden of proof is on that person. C. The department may prescribe a form for the certificate described in subsection A of this section.  Under such rules as it may prescribe, the department may also describe transactions with respect to which a person is not entitled to rely solely on the information contained in the certificate provided for in subsection A of this section but must instead obtain such additional information as required by the rules in order to be entitled to the deduction. D. If a seller is entitled to a deduction by complying with subsection A of this section, the department may require the purchaser that caused the execution of the certificate to establish the accuracy and completeness of the information required to be contained in the certificate that would entitle the seller to the deduction. If the purchaser cannot establish the accuracy and completeness of the information, the purchaser is liable in an amount equal to any tax, penalty and interest that the seller would have been required to pay under this article if the seller had not complied with subsection A of this section. Payment of the amount under this subsection exempts the purchaser from liability for any tax imposed under article 4 of this chapter. The amount shall be treated as tax revenues collected from the seller in order to designate the distribution base for purposes of section 42-5029. E. If a seller is entitled to a deduction by complying with subsection B of this section, the department may require the purchaser to establish the accuracy and completeness of the information provided to the seller that entitled the seller to the deduction.  If the purchaser cannot establish the accuracy and completeness of the information, the purchaser is liable in an amount equal to any tax, penalty and interest that the seller would have been required to pay under this article if the seller had not complied with subsection B of this section. Payment of the amount under this subsection exempts the purchaser from liability for any tax imposed under article 4 of this chapter. The amount shall be treated as tax revenues collected from the seller in order to designate the distribution base for purposes of section 42-5029. F. The department may prescribe a form for a certificate used to establish entitlement to the deductions described in section 42-5061, subsection A, paragraph 46 and section 42-5063, subsection B, paragraph 3.  Under rules the department may prescribe, the department may also require additional information for the seller to be entitled to the deduction. If a seller is entitled to the deductions described in section 42-5061, subsection A, paragraph 46 and section 42-5063, subsection B, paragraph 3, the department may require the purchaser who executed the certificate to establish the accuracy and completeness of the information contained in the certificate that would entitle the seller to the deduction. If the purchaser cannot establish the accuracy and completeness of the information, the purchaser is liable in an amount equal to any tax, penalty and interest that the seller would have been required to pay under this article. Payment of the amount under this subsection exempts the purchaser from liability for any tax imposed under article 4 of this chapter.  The amount shall be treated as tax revenues collected from the seller in order to designate the distribution base for purposes of section 42-5029. G. If a seller claims a deduction under section 42-5061, subsection A, paragraph 25 and establishes entitlement to the deduction with an exemption letter that the purchaser received from the department and the exemption letter was based on a contingent event, the department may require the purchaser that received the exemption letter to establish the satisfaction of the contingent event within a reasonable time. If the purchaser cannot establish the satisfaction of the event, the purchaser is liable in an amount equal to any tax, penalty and interest that the seller would have been required to pay under this article if the seller had not been furnished the exemption letter. Payment of the amount under this subsection exempts the purchaser from liability for any tax imposed under article 4 of this chapter. The amount shall be treated as tax revenues collected from the seller in order to designate the distribution base for purposes of section 42-5029. For the purposes of this subsection, "reasonable time" means a time limitation that the department determines and that does not exceed the time limitations pursuant to section 42-1104. H. The department shall prescribe forms for certificates used to establish the satisfaction of the criteria necessary to qualify the sale of a motor vehicle for the deductions described in section 42-5061, subsection A, paragraphs 14, 28 and 44 and subsection V. Except as provided in subsection J of this section, to establish entitlement to these deductions, a motor vehicle dealer shall retain: 1. A valid certificate as prescribed by this subsection completed by the purchaser and obtained before the issuance of the nonresident registration permit authorized by section 28-2154. 2. For the purposes of the deductions provided by section 42-5061, subsection A, paragraph 14, subdivision (b) and section 42-5061, subsection V, a copy of the nonresident registration permit authorized by section 28-2154. 3. A legible copy of a current valid driver license issued to the purchaser by another state or foreign country that indicates an address outside of this state. For the sale of a motor vehicle to a nonresident entity, the entity's representative must have a current valid driver license issued by the same jurisdiction as that in which the entity is located. 4. For the purposes of the deduction provided by section 42-5061, subsection A, paragraph 14, subdivision (a), a certificate documenting the delivery of the motor vehicle to an out-of-state location. I. Notwithstanding subsection A, paragraph 2 of this section, if a motor vehicle dealer has established entitlement to a deduction by complying with subsection H of this section, the department may require the purchaser who executed the certificate to establish the accuracy and completeness of the information contained in the certificate that entitled the motor vehicle dealer to the deduction. If the purchaser cannot establish the accuracy and completeness of the information, the purchaser is liable in an amount equal to any tax, penalty and interest that the motor vehicle dealer would have been required to pay under this article and under articles IV and V of the model city tax code as defined in section 42-6051. Payment of the amount under this subsection exempts the purchaser from liability for any tax imposed under article 4 of this chapter and any tax imposed under article VI of the model city tax code as defined in section 42-6051. The amount shall be treated as tax revenues collected from the motor vehicle dealer in order to designate the distribution base for purposes of section 42-5029. J. To establish entitlement to the deduction described in section 42-5061, subsection A, paragraph 44, a public consignment auction dealer as defined in section 28-4301 shall retain a copy of the certificate prescribed by subsection H of this section for its records. K. Notwithstanding any other law, compliance with subsection H of this section by a motor vehicle dealer entitles the motor vehicle dealer to the exemption provided in section 42-6004, subsection A, paragraph 4. L. The department shall prescribe a form for a certificate to be used by a person that is not subject to tax under section 42-5075 when the person is engaged by a contractor that is subject to tax under section 42-5075 for a project that is taxable under section 42-5075. The certificate permits the person purchasing tangible personal property to be incorporated or fabricated by the person into any real property, structure, project, development or improvement to provide documentation to a retailer that the sale of tangible personal property qualifies for the deduction under section 42-5061, subsection A, paragraph 27, subdivision (b). A prime contractor shall obtain the certificate from the department and shall provide a copy to any such person working on the project. The prime contractor shall obtain a new certificate for each project to which this subsection applies. For the purposes of this subsection, the following apply: 1. The person that is not subject to tax under section 42-5075 may use the certificate issued pursuant to this subsection only with respect to tangible personal property that will be incorporated into a project for which the gross receipts are subject to tax under section 42-5075. 2. The department shall issue the certificate to the prime contractor on receiving sufficient documentation to establish that the prime contractor meets the requirements of this subsection. 3. If any person uses the certificate provided under this subsection to purchase tangible personal property to be used in a project that is not subject to tax under section 42-5075, the person is liable in an amount equal to any tax, penalty and interest that the seller would have been required to pay under this article if the seller had not complied with subsection A of this section. Payment of the amount under this section exempts the person from liability for any tax imposed under article 4 of this chapter. The amount shall be sourced under section 42-5040, subsection A, paragraph 2. M. Notwithstanding any other law, compliance with subsection L of this section by a person that is not subject to tax under section 42-5075 entitles the person to the exemption allowed by section 465, subsection (k) of the model city tax code when purchasing tangible personal property to be incorporated or fabricated by the person into any real property, structure, project, development or improvement. N. The requirements of subsections A and B of this section do not apply to owners, proprietors or tenants of agricultural lands or farms who sell livestock or poultry feed that is grown or raised on their lands to any of the following: 1. Persons who feed their own livestock or poultry. 2. Persons who are engaged in the business of producing livestock or poultry commercially. 3. Persons who are engaged in the business of feeding livestock or poultry commercially or who board livestock noncommercially. O. A vendor who has reason to believe that a certificate prescribed by this section is not accurate or complete will not be relieved of the burden of proving entitlement to the exemption. A vendor that accepts a certificate in good faith will be relieved of the burden of proof and the purchaser may be required to establish the accuracy of the claimed exemption. If the purchaser cannot establish the accuracy and completeness of the information provided in the certificate, the purchaser is liable for an amount equal to the transaction privilege tax, penalty and interest that the vendor would have been required to pay if the vendor had not accepted the certificate. P. Notwithstanding any other law, an online lodging operator, as defined in section 42-5076, shall be entitled to an exclusion from any applicable taxes for any online lodging transaction, as defined in section 42-5076, facilitated by an online lodging marketplace, as defined in section 42-5076, for which the online lodging operator has obtained from the online lodging marketplace written notice that the online lodging marketplace is registered with the department to collect applicable taxes for all online lodging transactions facilitated by the online lodging marketplace, and transaction history documenting tax collected by the online lodging marketplace, pursuant to section 42-5005, subsection L. Q. P. The department shall prescribe the form of a certificate to be used by a person purchasing an aircraft to document eligibility for a deduction pursuant to section 42-5061, subsection B, paragraph 8, subdivision (a), item (v) or an exemption pursuant to section 42-5159, subsection B, paragraph 8, subdivision (a), item (v), relating to aircraft. The person must provide this certificate and documentation confirming that the operational control of the aircraft has been transferred or will be transferred immediately after the purchase to one or more persons described in section 42-5061, subsection B, paragraph 8, subdivision (a), item (i), (ii), (iii) or (iv) or section 42-5159, subsection B, paragraph 8, subdivision (a), item (i), (ii), (iii) or (iv).  Operational control of the aircraft must be transferred for at least fifty percent of the aircraft's flight hours. If such operational control is not transferred for at least fifty percent of the aircraft's flight hours during the recapture period, the owner of the aircraft is liable for an amount equal to any tax that the seller or purchaser would have been required to pay under this chapter at the time of the sale, plus penalty and interest. The recapture period begins on the date that operational control of the aircraft is first transferred and ends on the later of the date the aircraft is fully depreciated for federal income tax purposes or five years after operational control was first transferred. For the purposes of this subsection, operational control of the aircraft must be within the meaning of federal aviation administration operations specification A008, or its successor, except that: 1. If it is determined that operational control has been transferred for less than fifty percent but more than forty percent of the aircraft's flight hours, the owner of the aircraft is liable for an amount equal to any tax that the seller or purchaser would have been required to pay under this chapter at the time of the sale, plus interest. 2. If the aircraft is sold during the recapture period, the seller is not liable for the amount determined pursuant to this subsection unless the operational control of the aircraft had not been transferred for at least fifty percent of the aircraft's flight hours at the time of the sale. R. Q. Notwithstanding any other law, a shared vehicle owner is entitled to an exclusion from any applicable taxes for a shared vehicle transaction that is facilitated by a peer-to-peer car sharing program and for which the peer-to-peer car sharing program has collected and remitted applicable taxes. S. R. A qualifying community health center, qualifying health care organization or qualifying hospital or any other entity that is recognized as nonprofit under section 501(c) of the United States internal revenue code and that is required to obtain an exemption letter from the department shall: 1. Apply to the department for the exemption letter and fully answer any eligibility questions required by the department for the purposes of the exemption letter. If the department approves the exemption letter application, the exemption letter is valid until the entity is no longer qualified for the exemption letter. 2. Notify the department in writing if the entity no longer qualifies for the exemption letter. Regardless of whether the entity notifies the department as required by this paragraph, if the entity no longer qualifies for the exemption letter, the entity is liable in an amount equal to any tax, penalty and interest that the seller would have been required to pay under this article if the seller had not been furnished the exemption letter. Payment of the amount under this paragraph exempts the entity from liability for any tax imposed under article 4 of this chapter.  The amount shall be treated as tax revenues collected from the seller in order to designate the distribution base for the purposes of section 42-5029. T. S. For the purposes of this section, "peer-to-peer car sharing program", "shared vehicle owner" and "shared vehicle transaction" have the same meanings prescribed in section 28-9601. END_STATUTE Sec. 5. Section 42-5010, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE42-5010. Rates; distribution base A. The tax imposed by this article is levied and shall be collected at the following rates: 1. Five percent of the tax base as computed for the business of every person engaging or continuing in this state in the following business classifications described in article 2 of this chapter: (a) Transporting classification. (b) Utilities classification. (c) Telecommunications classification. (d) Pipeline classification. (e) Private car line classification. (f) Publication classification. (g) Job printing classification. (h) Prime contracting classification. (i) Amusement classification. (j) Restaurant classification. (k) Personal property rental classification. (l) Retail classification and amounts equal to retail transaction privilege tax due pursuant to section 42-5008.01. 2. Five and one-half percent of the tax base as computed for the business of every person engaging or continuing in this state in: (a) the transient lodging classification described in section 42-5070. (b) The online lodging marketplace classification described in section 42-5076 who has entered into an agreement with the department to register for, or has otherwise obtained from the department, a license to collect tax pursuant to section 42-5005, subsection L. 3. Three and one-eighth percent of the tax base as computed for the business of every person engaging or continuing in this state in the mining classification described in section 42-5072. 4. Zero percent of the tax base as computed for the business of every person engaging or continuing in this state in the commercial lease classification described in section 42-5069. B. Except as provided by subsections J and K of this section, twenty percent of the tax revenues collected at the rate prescribed by subsection A, paragraph 1 of this section from persons on account of engaging in business under the business classifications listed in subsection A, paragraph 1, subdivisions (a) through (h) of this section is designated as distribution base for the purposes of section 42-5029. C. Except as provided by subsection K of this section, forty percent of the tax revenues collected at the rate prescribed by subsection A, paragraph 1 of this section from persons on account of engaging in business under the business classifications listed in subsection A, paragraph 1, subdivisions (i) through (l) of this section is designated as distribution base for the purposes of section 42-5029. D. Thirty-two percent of the tax revenues collected from persons on account of engaging in business under the business classification listed in subsection A, paragraph 3 of this section is designated as distribution base for the purposes of section 42-5029. E. Fifty-three and one-third percent of the tax revenues collected from persons on account of engaging in business under the business classification listed in subsection A, paragraph 4 of this section is designated as distribution base for the purposes of section 42-5029. F. Fifty percent of the tax revenues collected from persons on account of engaging in business under the business classification listed in subsection A, paragraph 2 of this section is designated as distribution base for the purposes of section 42-5029. G. In addition to the rates prescribed by subsection A of this section, if approved by the qualified electors voting at a statewide general election, an additional rate increment is imposed and shall be collected through June 30, 2021. The taxpayer shall pay taxes pursuant to this subsection at the same time and in the same manner as under subsection A of this section. The department shall separately account for the revenues collected with respect to the rates imposed pursuant to this subsection and the state treasurer shall distribute all of those revenues in the manner prescribed by section 42-5029, subsection E.  The rates imposed pursuant to this subsection shall not be considered local revenues for purposes of article IX, section 21, Constitution of Arizona. The additional tax rate increment is levied at the rate of six-tenths of one per cent of the tax base of every person engaging or continuing in this state in a business classification listed in subsection A, paragraph 1 of this section. H. Any increase in the rate of tax that is imposed by this chapter and that is enacted by the legislature or by a vote of the people does not apply with respect to contracts entered into by prime contractors or pursuant to written bids made by prime contractors on or before the effective date of the legislation or the date of the election enacting the increase. To qualify for the exemption under this subsection, the prime contractor must maintain sufficient documentation, in a manner and form prescribed by the department, to verify the date of the contract or written bid. I. For taxpayers that are taxable under this chapter other than prime contractors taxable pursuant to section 42-5075: 1. Any increase in the rate of tax that is levied by this article or article 2 of this chapter enacted by the legislature or by a vote of the people does not apply for a period of one hundred twenty days after the date of the tax rate increase to the gross proceeds of sales or gross income from the business of the taxpayer with respect to written contracts entered into before the effective date of the tax rate increase unless the taxpayer has entered into a contract that contains a provision that entitles the taxpayer to recover from the purchaser the amount of the additional tax levied. 2. The provisions of this subsection apply without regard to the accounting method used by the taxpayer to report the taxes imposed under article 2 of this chapter. 3. The provisions of this subsection shall not be considered in determining the rate of tax imposed under chapter 6, article 3 of this title. J. Zero percent of the tax revenues that are collected at the rate prescribed by subsection A, paragraph 1 of this section from persons on account of engaging in business under the business classification listed in subsection A, paragraph 1, subdivision (h) of this section and that are subject to any distribution required by section 42-5032.02 is designated as distribution base for the purposes of section 42-5029 until the total amount subject to distribution pursuant to section 42-5032.02 has reached the maximum amount prescribed by section 42-5032.02, subsection C.  Thereafter, twenty percent of the remaining tax revenues is designated as distribution base for the purposes of section 42-5029 as provided by subsection B of this section. K. Subject to section 48-4238, beginning on October 1, 2025 through December 31, 2055, zero percent of the tax revenues that are collected at the rate prescribed by subsection A, paragraph 1 of this section from persons engaging in business under the business classifications listed in subsection A, paragraph 1, subdivisions (h), (i), (j) and (l) of this section and that are subject to transmittal required by section 42-5032.03 is designated as distribution base for the purposes of section 42-5029. Beginning January 1, 2056, twenty percent of the remaining tax revenues collected at the rate prescribed by subsection A, paragraph 1 of this section from persons engaging in business under the business classification listed in subsection A, paragraph 1, subdivision (h) of this section is designated as distribution base for the purposes of section 42-5029 as provided by subsection B of this section and forty percent of the remaining tax revenues collected at the rate prescribed by subsection A, paragraph 1 of this section from persons engaging in business under the business classifications listed in subsection A, paragraph 1, subdivisions (i), (j) and (l) of this section is designated as distribution base for the purposes of section 42-5029 as provided by subsection C of this section. END_STATUTE Sec. 6. Section 42-5014, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE42-5014. Return and payment of tax; estimated tax; extensions; abatements; definitions A. Except as provided in subsection B, C,  or D, E or F of this section, the taxes levied under this article: 1. Are due and payable monthly in the form required by section 42-5018 for the amount of the tax, to the department, on or before the twentieth day of the month next succeeding the month in which the tax accrues. 2. Are delinquent as follows: (a) For taxpayers that are required or elect to file and pay electronically in any month, if not received by the department on or before the last business day of the month. (b) For all other taxpayers, if not received by the department on or before the business day preceding the last business day of the month. B. The department, for any taxpayer whose estimated annual liability for taxes imposed or administered by this article or chapter 6 of this title is between $2,000 and $8,000, shall authorize the taxpayer to pay the taxes on a quarterly basis. The department, for any taxpayer whose estimated annual liability for taxes imposed by this article is less than $2,000, shall authorize the taxpayer to pay the taxes on an annual basis.  For the purposes of this subsection, the taxes due under this article: 1. For taxpayers that are authorized to pay on a quarterly basis, are due and payable monthly in the form required by section 42-5018 for the amount of the tax, to the department, on or before the twentieth day of the month next succeeding the quarter in which the tax accrues. 2. For taxpayers that are authorized to pay on an annual basis, are due and payable monthly in the form required by section 42-5018 for the amount of the tax, to the department, on or before the twentieth day of January next succeeding the year in which the tax accrues. 3. Are delinquent as follows: (a) For taxpayers that are required or elect to file and pay electronically in any quarter, if not received by the department on or before the last business day of the month. (b) For all other taxpayers that are required to file and pay quarterly, if not received by the department on or before the business day preceding the last business day of the month. (c) For taxpayers that are required or elect to file and pay electronically on an annual basis, if not received by the department on or before the last business day of January. (d) For all other taxpayers that are required to file and pay annually, if not received by the department on or before the business day preceding the last business day of January. C. The department may require a taxpayer whose business is of a transient character to file the return and remit the taxes imposed by this article on a daily, a weekly or a transaction-by-transaction basis, and those returns and payments are due and payable on the date fixed by the department without a grace period otherwise allowed by this section. For the purposes of this subsection, "business of a transient character" means sales activity by a taxpayer not regularly engaged in selling within this state that is conducted from vehicles, portable stands, rented spaces, structures or booths, or concessions at fairs, carnivals, circuses, festivals or similar activities for not more than thirty consecutive days. D. If the business entity under which a taxpayer reports and pays income tax under title 43 has an annual total tax liability under this article, article 6 of this chapter and chapter 6, article 3 of this title of $1,000,000 or more in 2019, $1,600,000 or more in 2020, $2,300,000 or more in 2021, $3,100,000 or more in 2022 or $4,100,000 or more in 2023 and each year thereafter, based on the actual tax liability in the preceding calendar year, regardless of the number of offices at which the taxes imposed by this article, article 6 of this chapter or chapter 6, article 3 of this title are collected, or if the taxpayer can reasonably anticipate such liability in the current year, the taxpayer shall report on a form prescribed by the department and pay an estimated tax payment each June.  Any other taxpayer may voluntarily elect to pay the estimated tax payment pursuant to this subsection. The payment shall be made on or before June 20 in the same manner as the taxpayer is required to make regular payments and is delinquent if not received by the department on or before the last business day of June if the taxpayer is required to make the payment by electronic means, is delinquent on or before the business day preceding the last business day of June for those taxpayers allowed to file by mail or is delinquent if not received by the department on the business day preceding the last business day of June for those taxpayers allowed to file in person. The estimated tax paid shall be credited against the taxpayer's tax liability under this article, article 6 of this chapter and chapter 6, article 3 of this title for the month of June for the current calendar year. The estimated tax payment shall equal either: 1. One-half of the actual tax liability under this article plus one-half of any tax liability under article 6 of this chapter and chapter 6, article 3 of this title for May of the current calendar year. 2. The actual tax liability under this article plus any tax liability under article 6 of this chapter and chapter 6, article 3 of this title for the first fifteen days of June of the current calendar year. E. An online lodging marketplace, as defined in section 42-5076, that is registered with the department pursuant to section 42-5005, subsection L: 1. Shall remit to the department the applicable taxes payable pursuant to section 42-5076 and chapter 6 of this title with respect to each online lodging transaction, as defined in section 42-5076, facilitated by the online lodging marketplace. 2. Shall report the taxes monthly and remit the aggregate total amounts for each of the respective taxing jurisdictions. 3. Shall not be required to list or otherwise identify any individual online lodging operator, as defined in section 42-5076, on any return or any attachment to a return. F. A person who is licensed pursuant to title 32, chapter 20 and who is licensed with the department pursuant to section 42-5005, subsection M shall: 1. File a consolidated return monthly with respect to all managed properties for which the licensee files an electronic consolidated tax return pursuant to section 42-6013. 2. Remit to the department the aggregate total amount of the applicable taxes payable pursuant to this chapter and chapter 6 of this title for all of the respective taxing jurisdictions with respect to the managed properties. G. e. A peer-to-peer car sharing program that is licensed by the department pursuant to section 42-5005, subsection N  L: 1. Shall electronically remit to the department the applicable taxes pursuant to section 42-5071 and chapter 6 of this title and any additional taxes, fees or charges on the gross proceeds or gross income of a shared vehicle transaction, subject to the limitations in section 28-9616, and, if the peer-to-peer car sharing program allows owners of vehicles that are not individual-owned shared vehicles to use the peer-to-peer car sharing program, applicable surcharges pursuant to sections 5-839 and 48-4234. 2. Shall electronically report the taxes monthly and remit the aggregate total amounts for each respective taxing jurisdiction. 3. Is not required to list or otherwise identify an individual-owned shared vehicle on any return or any attachment to a return.  The peer-to-peer car sharing program shall retain surcharge and tax information for each peer-to-peer car sharing program transaction and shall provide the information to the department at the department's request. H. f. The remittance of transaction privilege tax and any other tax applicable to a shared vehicle transaction by a peer-to-peer car sharing program fully satisfies any obligation of a shared vehicle owner to remit any taxes applicable to the shared vehicle transaction. I. g. The taxpayer shall prepare a return showing the amount of the tax for which the taxpayer is liable for the preceding month,  and shall mail or deliver the return to the department in the same manner and time as prescribed for the payment of taxes in subsection A of this section.  If the taxpayer fails to file the return in the manner and time as prescribed for the payment of taxes in subsection A of this section, the amount of the tax required to be shown on the return is subject to the penalty imposed pursuant to section 42-1125, subsection X, without any reduction for taxes paid on or before the due date of the return.  The return shall be verified by the oath of the taxpayer or an authorized agent or as prescribed by the department pursuant to section 42-1105, subsection B. J. h. Any person who is taxable under this article and who makes cash and credit sales shall report the cash and credit sales separately and may apply for and obtain from the department an extension of time to pay taxes due on the credit sales. The department shall grant the extension under such rules as the department prescribes. When the extension is granted, the taxpayer shall thereafter include in each monthly report all collections made on such credit sales during the month next preceding and shall pay the taxes due at the time of filing such a report. K. i. The returns required under this article shall be made on forms prescribed by the department and shall capture data with sufficient specificity to meet the needs of all taxing jurisdictions. L. j. Any person who is engaged in or conducting business in two or more locations or under two or more business names shall file the return required under this article using an electronic filing program established by the department. M. k. For taxable periods beginning from and after December 31, 2017, any taxpayer with an annual total tax liability under this chapter and chapter 6 of this title of $20,000 or more, based on the actual tax liability in the preceding calendar year, regardless of the number of offices at which the taxes imposed by this chapter or chapter 6 of this title are collected, or a taxpayer that can reasonably anticipate that liability in the current year, shall file the return required under this article using an electronic filing program established by the department. N. l. For taxable periods beginning from and after December 31, 2018, any taxpayer with an annual total tax liability under this chapter and chapter 6 of this title of $10,000 or more, based on the actual tax liability in the preceding calendar year, regardless of the number of offices at which the taxes imposed by this chapter or chapter 6 of this title are collected, or a taxpayer that can reasonably anticipate that liability in the current year, shall file the return required under this article using an electronic filing program established by the department. O. m. For taxable periods beginning from and after December 31, 2019, any taxpayer with an annual total tax liability under this chapter and chapter 6 of this title of $5,000 or more, based on the actual tax liability in the preceding calendar year, regardless of the number of offices at which the taxes imposed by this chapter or chapter 6 of this title are collected, or a taxpayer that can reasonably anticipate that liability in the current year, shall file the return required under this article using an electronic filing program established by the department. P. n. For taxable periods beginning from and after December 31, 2020, any taxpayer with an annual total tax liability under this chapter and chapter 6 of this title of $500 or more, based on the actual tax liability in the preceding calendar year, regardless of the number of offices at which the taxes imposed by this chapter or chapter 6 of this title are collected, or a taxpayer that can reasonably anticipate that liability in the current year, shall file the return required under this article using an electronic filing program established by the department. Q. o. Any taxpayer that is required to report and pay using an electronic filing program established by the department may apply to the director, on a form prescribed by the department, for an annual waiver from the electronic filing requirement.  The director may grant a waiver, which may be renewed, if any of the following applies: 1. The taxpayer has no computer. 2. The taxpayer has no internet access. 3. Any other circumstance considered to be worthy by the director exists. R. p. A waiver is not required if the return cannot be electronically filed for reasons beyond the taxpayer's control, including situations in which the taxpayer was instructed by either the internal revenue service or the department of revenue to file by paper. S. q. The department, for good cause, may extend the time for making any return required by this article and may grant such reasonable additional time within which to make the return as it deems proper, but the time for filing the return shall not be extended beyond the first day of the third month next succeeding the regular due date of the return. T. r. The department, with the approval of the attorney general, may abate small tax balances if the administration costs exceed the amount of tax due. U. s. For the purposes of subsection D of this section, "taxpayer" means the business entity under which the business reports and pays state income taxes regardless of the number of offices at which the taxes imposed by this article, article 6 of this chapter or chapter 6, article 3 of this title are collected. V. t. For the purposes of this section, "individual-owned shared vehicle", "peer-to-peer car sharing program", "shared vehicle owner" and "shared vehicle transaction" have the same meanings prescribed in section 28-9601. END_STATUTE Sec. 7. Repeal Section 42-5042, Arizona Revised Statutes, is repealed. Sec. 8. Section 42-5061, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE42-5061. Retail classification; definitions A. The retail classification is comprised of the business of selling tangible personal property at retail. The tax base for the retail classification is the gross proceeds of sales or gross income derived from the business. The tax imposed on the retail classification does not apply to the gross proceeds of sales or gross income from: 1. Professional or personal service occupations or businesses that involve sales or transfers of tangible personal property only as inconsequential elements. 2. Services rendered in addition to selling tangible personal property at retail. 3. Sales of warranty or service contracts. The storage, use or consumption of tangible personal property provided under the conditions of such contracts is subject to tax under section 42-5156. 4. Sales of tangible personal property by any nonprofit organization organized and operated exclusively for charitable purposes and recognized by the United States internal revenue service under section 501(c)(3) of the internal revenue code. 5. Sales to persons engaged in business classified under the restaurant classification of articles used by human beings for food, drink or condiment, whether simple, mixed or compounded. 6. Business activity that is properly included in any other business classification that is taxable under this article. 7. The sale of stocks and bonds. 8. Drugs and medical oxygen, including delivery hose, mask or tent, regulator and tank, if prescribed by a member of the medical, dental or veterinarian profession who is licensed by law to administer such substances. 9. Prosthetic appliances as defined in section 23-501 and as prescribed or recommended by a health professional who is licensed pursuant to title 32, chapter 7, 8, 11, 13, 14, 15, 16, 17 or 29. 10. Insulin, insulin syringes and glucose test strips. 11. Prescription eyeglasses or contact lenses. 12. Hearing aids as defined in section 36-1901. 13. Durable medical equipment that has a centers for medicare and medicaid services common procedure code, is designated reimbursable by medicare, is prescribed by a person who is licensed under title 32, chapter 7, 8, 13, 14, 15, 17 or 29, can withstand repeated use, is primarily and customarily used to serve a medical purpose, is generally not useful to a person in the absence of illness or injury and is appropriate for use in the home. 14. Sales of motor vehicles to nonresidents of this state for use outside this state if either of the following applies: (a) The motor vehicle dealer ships or delivers the motor vehicle to a destination out of this state. (b) The vehicle, trailer or semitrailer has a gross vehicle weight rating of more than ten thousand pounds, is used or maintained to transport property in the furtherance of interstate commerce and otherwise meets the definition of commercial motor vehicle as defined in section 28-5201. 15. Food, as provided in and subject to the conditions of article 3 of this chapter and sections 42-5074 and 42-6017. 16. Items purchased with United States department of agriculture coupons issued under the supplemental nutrition assistance program pursuant to the food and nutrition act of 2008 (P.L. 88-525; 78 Stat. 703; 7 United States Code sections 2011 through 2036b) by the United States department of agriculture food and nutrition service or food instruments issued under section 17 of the child nutrition act (P.L. 95-627; 92 Stat. 3603; P.L. 99-661, section 4302; P.L. 111-296; 42 United States Code section 1786). 17. Textbooks by any bookstore that are required by any state university or community college. 18. Food and drink to a person that is engaged in a business that is classified under the restaurant classification and that provides such food and drink without monetary charge to its employees for their own consumption on the premises during the employees' hours of employment. 19. Articles of food, drink or condiment and accessory tangible personal property to a school district or charter school if such articles and accessory tangible personal property are to be prepared and served to persons for consumption on the premises of a public school within the district or on the premises of the charter school during school hours. 20. Lottery tickets or shares pursuant to title 5, chapter 5.1, article 2. 21. The sale of cash equivalents and the sale of precious metal bullion and monetized bullion to the ultimate consumer, but the sale of coins or other forms of money for manufacture into jewelry or works of art is subject to the tax and the gross proceeds of sales or gross income derived from the redemption of any cash equivalent by the holder as a means of payment for goods or services that are taxable under this article is subject to the tax. For the purposes of this paragraph: (a) "Cash equivalents" means items or intangibles, whether or not negotiable, that are sold to one or more persons, through which a value denominated in money is purchased in advance and may be redeemed in full or in part for tangible personal property, intangibles or services. Cash equivalents include gift cards, stored value cards, gift certificates, vouchers, traveler's checks, money orders or other instruments, orders or electronic mechanisms, such as an electronic code, personal identification number or digital payment mechanism, or any other prepaid intangible right to acquire tangible personal property, intangibles or services in the future, whether from the seller of the cash equivalent or from another person. Cash equivalents do not include either of the following: (i) Items or intangibles that are sold to one or more persons, through which a value is not denominated in money. (ii) Prepaid calling cards or prepaid authorization numbers for telecommunications services made taxable by subsection P of this section. (b) "Monetized bullion" means coins and other forms of money that are manufactured from gold, silver or other metals and that have been or are used as a medium of exchange in this or another state, the United States or a foreign nation. (c) "Precious metal bullion" means precious metal, including gold, silver, platinum, rhodium and palladium, that has been smelted or refined so that its value depends on its contents and not on its form. 22. Motor vehicle fuel and use fuel that are subject to a tax imposed under title 28, chapter 16, article 1, sales of use fuel to a holder of a valid single trip use fuel tax permit issued under section 28-5739, sales of aviation fuel that are subject to the tax imposed under section 28-8344 and sales of jet fuel that are subject to the tax imposed under article 8 of this chapter. 23. Tangible personal property sold to a person engaged in the business of leasing or renting such property under the personal property rental classification if such property is to be leased or rented by such person. 24. Tangible personal property sold in interstate or foreign commerce if prohibited from being so taxed by the constitution of the United States or the constitution of this state. 25. Tangible personal property sold to: (a) A qualifying hospital as defined in section 42-5001. (b) A qualifying health care organization as defined in section 42-5001 if the tangible personal property is used by the organization solely to provide health and medical related educational and charitable services. (c) A qualifying health care organization as defined in section 42-5001 if the organization is dedicated to providing educational, therapeutic, rehabilitative and family medical education training for blind and visually impaired children and children with multiple disabilities from the time of birth to age twenty-one. (d) A qualifying community health center as defined in section 42-5001. (e) A nonprofit charitable organization that has qualified under section 501(c)(3) of the internal revenue code and that regularly serves meals to the needy and indigent on a continuing basis at no cost. (f) For taxable periods beginning from and after June 30, 2001, a nonprofit charitable organization that has qualified under section 501(c)(3) of the internal revenue code and that provides residential apartment housing for low-income persons over sixty-two years of age in a facility that qualifies for a federal housing subsidy, if the tangible personal property is used by the organization solely to provide residential apartment housing for low-income persons over sixty-two years of age in a facility that qualifies for a federal housing subsidy. (g) A qualifying health sciences educational institution as defined in section 42-5001. (h) Any person representing or working on behalf of another person described in subdivisions (a) through (g) of this paragraph if the tangible personal property is incorporated or fabricated into a project described in section 42-5075, subsection P. 26. Magazines or other periodicals or other publications by this state to encourage tourist travel. 27. Tangible personal property sold to: (a) A person that is subject to tax under this article by reason of being engaged in business classified under section 42-5075 or to a subcontractor working under the control of a person engaged in business classified under section 42-5075, if the property so sold is any of the following: (i) Incorporated or fabricated by the person into any real property, structure, project, development or improvement as part of the business. (ii) Incorporated or fabricated by the person into any project described in section 42-5075, subsection P. (iii) Used in environmental response or remediation activities under section 42-5075, subsection B, paragraph 6. (b) A person that is not subject to tax under section 42-5075 and that has been provided a copy of a certificate under section 42-5009, subsection L, if the property so sold is incorporated or fabricated by the person into the real property, structure, project, development or improvement described in the certificate. 28. The sale of a motor vehicle to a nonresident of this state if the purchaser's state of residence does not allow a corresponding use tax exemption to the tax imposed by article 1 of this chapter and if the nonresident has secured a special ninety day nonresident registration permit for the vehicle as prescribed by sections 28-2154 and 28-2154.01. 29. Tangible personal property purchased in this state by a nonprofit charitable organization that has qualified under section 501(c)(3) of the United States internal revenue code and that engages in and uses such property exclusively in programs for persons with mental or physical disabilities if the programs are exclusively for training, job placement, rehabilitation or testing. 30. Sales of tangible personal property by a nonprofit organization that is exempt from taxation under section 501(c)(3), 501(c)(4) or 501(c)(6) of the internal revenue code if the organization is associated with a major league baseball team or a national touring professional golfing association and no part of the organization's net earnings inures to the benefit of any private shareholder or individual. This paragraph does not apply to an organization that is owned, managed or controlled, in whole or in part, by a major league baseball team, or its owners, officers, employees or agents, or by a major league baseball association or professional golfing association, or its owners, officers, employees or agents, unless the organization conducted or operated exhibition events in this state before January 1, 2018 that were exempt from taxation under section 42-5073. 31. Sales of commodities, as defined by title 7 United States Code section 2, that are consigned for resale in a warehouse in this state in or from which the commodity is deliverable on a contract for future delivery subject to the rules of a commodity market regulated by the United States commodity futures trading commission. 32. Sales of tangible personal property by a nonprofit organization that is exempt from taxation under section 501(c)(3), 501(c)(4), 501(c)(6), 501(c)(7) or 501(c)(8) of the internal revenue code if the organization sponsors or operates a rodeo featuring primarily farm and ranch animals and no part of the organization's net earnings inures to the benefit of any private shareholder or individual. 33. Sales of propagative materials to persons who use those items to commercially produce agricultural, horticultural, viticultural or floricultural crops in this state. For the purposes of this paragraph, "propagative materials": (a) Includes seeds, seedlings, roots, bulbs, liners, transplants, cuttings, soil and plant additives, agricultural minerals, auxiliary soil and plant substances, micronutrients, fertilizers, insecticides, herbicides, fungicides, soil fumigants, desiccants, rodenticides, adjuvants, plant nutrients and plant growth regulators. (b) Except for use in commercially producing industrial hemp as defined in section 3-311, does not include any propagative materials used in producing any part, including seeds, of any plant of the genus cannabis. 34. Machinery, equipment, technology or related supplies that are only useful to assist a person with a physical disability as defined in section 46-191 or a person who has a developmental disability as defined in section 36-551 or has a head injury as defined in section 41-3201 to be more independent and functional. 35. Sales of natural gas or liquefied petroleum gas used to propel a motor vehicle. 36. Paper machine clothing, such as forming fabrics and dryer felts, sold to a paper manufacturer and directly used or consumed in paper manufacturing. 37. Coal, petroleum, coke, natural gas, virgin fuel oil and electricity sold to a qualified environmental technology manufacturer, producer or processor as defined in section 41-1514.02 and directly used or consumed in generating or providing on-site power or energy solely for environmental technology manufacturing, producing or processing or environmental protection. This paragraph applies for twenty full consecutive calendar or fiscal years from after the date the first paper manufacturing machine is placed in service. In the case of an environmental technology manufacturer, producer or processor that does not manufacture paper, the time period begins with the date the first manufacturing, processing or production equipment is placed in service. 38. Sales of liquid, solid or gaseous chemicals used in manufacturing, processing, fabricating, mining, refining, metallurgical operations, research and development and, beginning on January 1, 1999, printing, if using or consuming the chemicals, alone or as part of an integrated system of chemicals, involves direct contact with the materials from which the product is produced for the purpose of causing or allowing a chemical or physical change to occur in the materials as part of the production process. This paragraph does not include chemicals that are used or consumed in activities such as packaging, storage or transportation but does not affect any deduction for such chemicals that is otherwise provided by this section. For the purposes of this paragraph, "printing" means a commercial printing operation and includes job printing, engraving, embossing, copying and bookbinding. 39. Through December 31, 1994, personal property liquidation transactions, conducted by a personal property liquidator. From and after December 31, 1994, personal property liquidation transactions shall be taxable under this section provided that nothing in this subsection shall be construed to authorize the taxation of casual activities or transactions under this chapter. For the purposes of this paragraph: (a) "Personal property liquidation transaction" means a sale of personal property made by a personal property liquidator acting solely on behalf of the owner of the personal property sold at the dwelling of the owner or on the death of any owner, on behalf of the surviving spouse, if any, any devisee or heir or the personal representative of the estate of the deceased, if one has been appointed. (b) "Personal property liquidator" means a person who is retained to conduct a sale in a personal property liquidation transaction. 40. Sales of food, drink and condiment for consumption within the premises of any prison, jail or other institution under the jurisdiction of the state department of corrections, the department of public safety, the department of juvenile corrections or a county sheriff. 41. A motor vehicle and any repair and replacement parts and tangible personal property becoming a part of such motor vehicle sold to a motor carrier that is subject to a fee prescribed in title 28, chapter 16, article 4 and that is engaged in the business of leasing or renting such property. 42. Sales of: (a) Livestock and poultry to persons engaging in the businesses of farming, ranching or producing livestock or poultry. (b) Livestock and poultry feed, salts, vitamins and other additives for livestock or poultry consumption that are sold to persons for use or consumption by their own livestock or poultry, for use or consumption in the businesses of farming, ranching and producing or feeding livestock, poultry, or livestock or poultry products or for use or consumption in noncommercial boarding of livestock. For the purposes of this paragraph, "poultry" includes ratites. 43. Sales of implants used as growth promotants and injectable medicines, not already exempt under paragraph 8 of this subsection, for livestock or poultry owned by or in possession of persons that are engaged in producing livestock, poultry, or livestock or poultry products or that are engaged in feeding livestock or poultry commercially. For the purposes of this paragraph, "poultry" includes ratites. 44. Sales of motor vehicles at auction to nonresidents of this state for use outside this state if the vehicles are shipped or delivered out of this state, regardless of where title to the motor vehicles passes or its free on board point. 45. Tangible personal property sold to a person engaged in business and subject to tax under the transient lodging classification if the tangible personal property is a personal hygiene item or articles used by human beings for food, drink or condiment, except alcoholic beverages, that are furnished without additional charge to and intended to be consumed by the transient during the transient's occupancy. 46. Sales of alternative fuel, as defined in section 1-215, to a used oil fuel burner who has received a permit to burn used oil or used oil fuel under section 49-426 or 49-480. 47. Sales of materials that are purchased by or for publicly funded libraries, including school district libraries, charter school libraries, community college libraries, state university libraries or federal, state, county or municipal libraries, for use by the public as follows: (a) Printed or photographic materials, beginning August 7, 1985. (b) Electronic or digital media materials, beginning July 17, 1994. 48. Tangible personal property sold to a commercial airline and consisting of food, beverages and condiments and accessories used for serving the food and beverages, if those items are to be provided without additional charge to passengers for consumption in flight. For the purposes of this paragraph, "commercial airline" means a person holding a federal certificate of public convenience and necessity or foreign air carrier permit for air transportation to transport persons, property or United States mail in intrastate, interstate or foreign commerce. 49. Sales of alternative fuel vehicles if the vehicle was manufactured as a diesel fuel vehicle and converted to operate on alternative fuel and equipment that is installed in a conventional diesel fuel motor vehicle to convert the vehicle to operate on an alternative fuel, as defined in section 1-215. 50. Sales of any spirituous, vinous or malt liquor by a person that is licensed in this state as a wholesaler by the department of liquor licenses and control pursuant to title 4, chapter 2, article 1. 51. Sales of tangible personal property to be incorporated or installed as part of environmental response or remediation activities under section 42-5075, subsection B, paragraph 6. 52. Sales of tangible personal property by a nonprofit organization that is exempt from taxation under section 501(c)(6) of the internal revenue code if the organization produces, organizes or promotes cultural or civic related festivals or events and no part of the organization's net earnings inures to the benefit of any private shareholder or individual. 53. Application services that are designed to assess or test student learning or to promote curriculum design or enhancement purchased by or for any school district, charter school, community college or state university. For the purposes of this paragraph: (a) "Application services" means software applications provided remotely using hypertext transfer protocol or another network protocol. (b) "Curriculum design or enhancement" means planning, implementing or reporting on courses of study, lessons, assignments or other learning activities. 54. Sales of motor vehicle fuel and use fuel to a qualified business under section 41-1516 for off-road use in harvesting, processing or transporting qualifying forest products removed from qualifying projects as defined in section 41-1516. 55. Sales of repair parts installed in equipment used directly by a qualified business under section 41-1516 in harvesting, processing or transporting qualifying forest products removed from qualifying projects as defined in section 41-1516. 56. Sales or other transfers of renewable energy credits or any other unit created to track energy derived from renewable energy resources. For the purposes of this paragraph, "renewable energy credit" means a unit created administratively by the corporation commission or governing body of a public power utility to track kilowatt hours of electricity derived from a renewable energy resource or the kilowatt hour equivalent of conventional energy resources displaced by distributed renewable energy resources. 57. Orthodontic devices dispensed by a dental professional who is licensed under title 32, chapter 11 to a patient as part of the practice of dentistry. 58. Sales of tangible personal property incorporated or fabricated into a project described in section 42-5075, subsection P, that is located within the exterior boundaries of an Indian reservation for which the owner, as defined in section 42-5075, of the project is an Indian tribe or an affiliated Indian. For the purposes of this paragraph: (a) "Affiliated Indian" means an individual Native American Indian who is duly registered on the tribal rolls of the Indian tribe for whose benefit the Indian reservation was established. (b) "Indian reservation" means all lands that are within the limits of areas set aside by the United States for the exclusive use and occupancy of an Indian tribe by treaty, law or executive order and that are recognized as Indian reservations by the United States department of the interior. (c) "Indian tribe" means any organized nation, tribe, band or community that is recognized as an Indian tribe by the United States department of the interior and includes any entity formed under the laws of the Indian tribe. 59. Sales of works of fine art, as defined in section 44-1771, at an art auction or gallery in this state to nonresidents of this state for use outside this state if the vendor ships or delivers the work of fine art to a destination outside this state. 60. Sales of tangible personal property by a marketplace seller that are facilitated by a marketplace facilitator in which the marketplace facilitator has remitted or will remit the applicable tax to the department pursuant to section 42-5014. B. In addition to the deductions from the tax base prescribed by subsection A of this section, the gross proceeds of sales or gross income derived from sales of the following categories of tangible personal property shall be deducted from the tax base: 1. Machinery, or equipment, used directly in manufacturing, processing, fabricating, job printing, refining or metallurgical operations. The terms "manufacturing", "processing", "fabricating", "job printing", "refining" and "metallurgical" as used in this paragraph refer to and include those operations commonly understood within their ordinary meaning. "Metallurgical operations" includes leaching, milling, precipitating, smelting and refining. 2. Mining machinery, or equipment, used directly in the process of extracting ores or minerals from the earth for commercial purposes, including equipment required to prepare the materials for extraction and handling, loading or transporting such extracted material to the surface. "Mining" includes underground, surface and open pit operations for extracting ores and minerals. 3. Tangible personal property sold to persons engaged in business classified under the telecommunications classification, including a person representing or working on behalf of such a person in a manner described in section 42-5075, subsection P, and consisting of central office switching equipment, switchboards, private branch exchange equipment, microwave radio equipment and carrier equipment including optical fiber, coaxial cable and other transmission media that are components of carrier systems. 4. Machinery, equipment or transmission lines used directly in producing or transmitting electrical power, but not including distribution. Transformers and control equipment used at transmission substation sites constitute equipment used in producing or transmitting electrical power. 5. Machinery and equipment used directly for energy storage for later electrical use. For the purposes of this paragraph: (a) "Electric utility scale" means a person that is engaged in a business activity described in section 42-5063, subsection A or such person's equipment or wholesale electricity suppliers. (b) "Energy storage" means commercially available technology for electric utility scale that is capable of absorbing energy, storing energy for a period of time and thereafter dispatching the energy and that uses mechanical, chemical or thermal processes to store energy. (c) "Machinery and equipment used directly" means all machinery and equipment that are used for electric energy storage from the point of receipt of such energy in order to facilitate storage of the electric energy to the point where the electric energy is released. 6. Neat animals, horses, asses, sheep, ratites, swine or goats used or to be used as breeding or production stock, including sales of breedings or ownership shares in such animals used for breeding or production. 7. Pipes or valves four inches in diameter or larger used to transport oil, natural gas, artificial gas, water, wastewater or coal slurry, including compressor units, regulators, machinery and equipment, fittings, seals and any other part that is used in operating the pipes or valves. 8. Aircraft, navigational and communication instruments and other accessories and related equipment sold to: (a) A person: (i) Holding, or exempted by federal law from obtaining, a federal certificate of public convenience and necessity for use as, in conjunction with or becoming part of an aircraft to be used to transport persons for hire in intrastate, interstate or foreign commerce. (ii) That is certificated or licensed under federal aviation administration regulations (14 Code of Federal Regulations part 121 or 135) as a scheduled or unscheduled carrier of persons for hire for use as or in conjunction with or becoming part of an aircraft to be used to transport persons for hire in intrastate, interstate or foreign commerce. (iii) Holding a foreign air carrier permit for air transportation for use as or in conjunction with or becoming a part of aircraft to be used to transport persons, property or United States mail in intrastate, interstate or foreign commerce. (iv) Operating an aircraft to transport persons in any manner for compensation or hire, or for use in a fractional ownership program that meets the requirements of federal aviation administration regulations (14 Code of Federal Regulations part 91, subpart K), including as an air carrier, a foreign air carrier or a commercial operator or under a restricted category, within the meaning of 14 Code of Federal Regulations, regardless of whether the operation or aircraft is regulated or certified under part 91, 119, 121, 133, 135, 136 or 137, or another part of 14 Code of Federal Regulations. (v) That will lease or otherwise transfer operational control, within the meaning of federal aviation administration operations specification A008, or its successor, of the aircraft, instruments or accessories to one or more persons described in item (i), (ii), (iii) or (iv) of this subdivision, subject to section 42-5009, subsection Q  p. (b) Any foreign government. (c) Persons who are not residents of this state and who will not use such property in this state other than in removing such property from this state. This subdivision also applies to corporations that are not incorporated in this state, regardless of maintaining a place of business in this state, if the principal corporate office is located outside this state and the property will not be used in this state other than in removing the property from this state. 9. Machinery, tools, equipment and related supplies used or consumed directly in repairing, remodeling or maintaining aircraft, aircraft engines or aircraft component parts by or on behalf of a certificated or licensed carrier of persons or property. 10. Railroad rolling stock, rails, ties and signal control equipment used directly to transport persons or property. 11. Machinery or equipment used directly to drill for oil or gas or used directly in the process of extracting oil or gas from the earth for commercial purposes. 12. Buses or other urban mass transit vehicles that are used directly to transport persons or property for hire or pursuant to a governmentally adopted and controlled urban mass transportation program and that are sold to bus companies holding a federal certificate of convenience and necessity or operated by any city, town or other governmental entity or by any person contracting with such governmental entity as part of a governmentally adopted and controlled program to provide urban mass transportation. 13. Groundwater measuring devices required under section 45-604. 14. Machinery and equipment consisting of agricultural aircraft, tractors, off-highway vehicles, tractor-drawn implements, self-powered implements, machinery and equipment necessary for extracting milk, and machinery and equipment necessary for cooling milk and livestock, and drip irrigation lines not already exempt under paragraph 7 of this subsection and that are used for commercial production of agricultural, horticultural, viticultural and floricultural crops and products in this state. For the purposes of this paragraph: (a) "Off-highway vehicles" means off-highway vehicles as defined in section 28-1171 that are modified at the time of sale to function as a tractor or to tow tractor-drawn implements and that are not equipped with a modified exhaust system to increase horsepower or speed or an engine that is more than one thousand cubic centimeters or that have a maximum speed of fifty miles per hour or less. (b) "Self-powered implements" includes machinery and equipment that are electric-powered. 15. Machinery or equipment used in research and development. For the purposes of this paragraph, "research and development" means basic and applied research in the sciences and engineering, and designing, developing or testing prototypes, processes or new products, including research and development of computer software that is embedded in or an integral part of the prototype or new product or that is required for machinery or equipment otherwise exempt under this section to function effectively. Research and development do not include manufacturing quality control, routine consumer product testing, market research, sales promotion, sales service, research in social sciences or psychology, computer software research that is not included in the definition of research and development, or other nontechnological activities or technical services. 16. Tangible personal property that is used by either of the following to receive, store, convert, produce, generate, decode, encode, control or transmit telecommunications information: (a) Any direct broadcast satellite television or data transmission service that operates pursuant to 47 Code of Federal Regulations part 25. (b) Any satellite television or data transmission facility, if both of the following conditions are met: (i) Over two-thirds of the transmissions, measured in megabytes, transmitted by the facility during the test period were transmitted to or on behalf of one or more direct broadcast satellite television or data transmission services that operate pursuant to 47 Code of Federal Regulations part 25. (ii) Over two-thirds of the transmissions, measured in megabytes, transmitted by or on behalf of those direct broadcast television or data transmission services during the test period were transmitted by the facility to or on behalf of those services. For the purposes of subdivision (b) of this paragraph, "test period" means the three hundred sixty-five day period beginning on the later of the date on which the tangible personal property is purchased or the date on which the direct broadcast satellite television or data transmission service first transmits information to its customers. 17. Clean rooms that are used for manufacturing, processing, fabrication or research and development, as defined in paragraph 15 of this subsection, of semiconductor products. For the purposes of this paragraph, "clean room" means all property that comprises or creates an environment where humidity, temperature, particulate matter and contamination are precisely controlled within specified parameters, without regard to whether the property is actually contained within that environment or whether any of the property is affixed to or incorporated into real property. Clean room: (a) Includes the integrated systems, fixtures, piping, movable partitions, lighting and all property that is necessary or adapted to reduce contamination or to control airflow, temperature, humidity, chemical purity or other environmental conditions or manufacturing tolerances, as well as the production machinery and equipment operating in conjunction with the clean room environment. (b) Does not include the building or other permanent, nonremovable component of the building that houses the clean room environment. 18. Machinery and equipment used directly in feeding poultry, environmentally controlling housing for poultry, moving eggs within a production and packaging facility or sorting or cooling eggs. This exemption does not apply to vehicles used for transporting eggs. 19. Machinery or equipment, including related structural components and containment structures, that is employed in connection with manufacturing, processing, fabricating, job printing, refining, mining, natural gas pipelines, metallurgical operations, telecommunications, producing or transmitting electricity or research and development and that is used directly to meet or exceed rules or regulations adopted by the federal energy regulatory commission, the United States environmental protection agency, the United States nuclear regulatory commission, the Arizona department of environmental quality or a political subdivision of this state to prevent, monitor, control or reduce land, water or air pollution. For the purposes of this paragraph, "containment structure" means a structure that prevents, monitors, controls or reduces noxious or harmful discharge into the environment. 20. Machinery and equipment that are sold to a person engaged in commercially producing livestock, livestock products or agricultural, horticultural, viticultural or floricultural crops or products in this state, including a person representing or working on behalf of such a person in a manner described in section 42-5075, subsection P, if the machinery and equipment are used directly and primarily to prevent, monitor, control or reduce air, water or land pollution. 21. Machinery or equipment that enables a television station to originate and broadcast or to receive and broadcast digital television signals and that was purchased to facilitate compliance with the telecommunications act of 1996 (P.L. 104-104; 110 Stat. 56; 47 United States Code section 336) and the federal communications commission order issued April 21, 1997 (47 Code of Federal Regulations part 73). This paragraph does not exempt any of the following: (a) Repair or replacement parts purchased for the machinery or equipment described in this paragraph. (b) Machinery or equipment purchased to replace machinery or equipment for which an exemption was previously claimed and taken under this paragraph. (c) Any machinery or equipment purchased after the television station has ceased analog broadcasting, or purchased after November 1, 2009, whichever occurs first. 22. Qualifying equipment that is purchased from and after June 30, 2004 through December 31, 2028 by a qualified business under section 41-1516 for harvesting or processing qualifying forest products removed from qualifying projects as defined in section 41-1516. To qualify for this deduction, the qualified business at the time of purchase must present its certification approved by the department. 23. Computer data center equipment sold to the owner, operator or qualified colocation tenant of a computer data center that is certified by the Arizona commerce authority under section 41-1519 or an authorized agent of the owner, operator or qualified colocation tenant during the qualification period for use in the qualified computer data center. For the purposes of this paragraph, "computer data center", "computer data center equipment", "qualification period" and "qualified colocation tenant" have the same meanings prescribed in section 41-1519. C. The deductions provided by subsection B of this section do not include sales of: 1. Expendable materials. For the purposes of this paragraph, expendable materials do not include any of the categories of tangible personal property specified in subsection B of this section regardless of the cost or useful life of that property. 2. Janitorial equipment and hand tools. 3. Office equipment, furniture and supplies. 4. Tangible personal property used in selling or distributing activities, other than the telecommunications transmissions described in subsection B, paragraph 16 of this section. 5. Motor vehicles required to be licensed by this state, except buses or other urban mass transit vehicles specifically exempted pursuant to subsection B, paragraph 12 of this section, without regard to the use of such motor vehicles. 6. Shops, buildings, docks, depots and all other materials of whatever kind or character not specifically included as exempt. 7. Motors and pumps used in drip irrigation systems. 8. Machinery and equipment or other tangible personal property used by a contractor in performing a contract. D. In addition to the deductions from the tax base prescribed by subsection A of this section, there shall be deducted from the tax base the gross proceeds of sales or gross income derived from sales of machinery, equipment, materials and other tangible personal property used directly and predominantly to construct a qualified environmental technology manufacturing, producing or processing facility as described in section 41-1514.02. This subsection applies for ten full consecutive calendar or fiscal years after the start of initial construction. E. In computing the tax base, gross proceeds of sales or gross income from retail sales of heavy trucks and trailers does not include any amount attributable to federal excise taxes imposed by 26 United States Code section 4051. F. If a person is engaged in an occupation or business to which subsection A of this section applies, the person's books shall be kept so as to show separately the gross proceeds of sales of tangible personal property and the gross income from sales of services, and if not so kept the tax shall be imposed on the total of the person's gross proceeds of sales of tangible personal property and gross income from services. G. If a person is engaged in the business of selling tangible personal property at both wholesale and retail, the tax under this section applies only to the gross proceeds of the sales made other than at wholesale if the person's books are kept so as to show separately the gross proceeds of sales of each class, and if the books are not so kept, the tax under this section applies to the gross proceeds of every sale so made. H. A person who engages in manufacturing, baling, crating, boxing, barreling, canning, bottling, sacking, preserving, processing or otherwise preparing for sale or commercial use any livestock, agricultural or horticultural product or any other product, article, substance or commodity and who sells the product of such business at retail in this state is deemed, as to such sales, to be engaged in business classified under the retail classification. This subsection does not apply to: 1. Agricultural producers who are owners, proprietors or tenants of agricultural lands, orchards, farms or gardens where agricultural products are grown, raised or prepared for market and who are marketing their own agricultural products. 2. Businesses classified under the: (a) Transporting classification. (b) Utilities classification. (c) Telecommunications classification. (d) Pipeline classification. (e) Private car line classification. (f) Publication classification. (g) Job printing classification. (h) Prime contracting classification. (i) Restaurant classification. I. The gross proceeds of sales or gross income derived from the following shall be deducted from the tax base for the retail classification: 1. Sales made directly to the United States government or its departments or agencies by a manufacturer, modifier, assembler or repairer. 2. Sales made directly to a manufacturer, modifier, assembler or repairer if such sales are of any ingredient or component part of products sold directly to the United States government or its departments or agencies by the manufacturer, modifier, assembler or repairer. 3. Overhead materials or other tangible personal property that is used in performing a contract between the United States government and a manufacturer, modifier, assembler or repairer, including property used in performing a subcontract with a government contractor who is a manufacturer, modifier, assembler or repairer, to which title passes to the government under the terms of the contract or subcontract. 4. Sales of overhead materials or other tangible personal property to a manufacturer, modifier, assembler or repairer if the gross proceeds of sales or gross income derived from the property by the manufacturer, modifier, assembler or repairer will be exempt under paragraph 3 of this subsection. J. There shall be deducted from the tax base fifty percent of the gross proceeds or gross income from any sale of tangible personal property made directly to the United States government or its departments or agencies that is not deducted under subsection I of this section. K. The department shall require every person claiming a deduction provided by subsection I or J of this section to file on forms prescribed by the department at such times as the department directs a sworn statement disclosing the name of the purchaser and the exact amount of sales on which the exclusion or deduction is claimed. L. In computing the tax base, gross proceeds of sales or gross income does not include: 1. A manufacturer's cash rebate on the sales price of a motor vehicle if the buyer assigns the buyer's right in the rebate to the retailer. 2. The waste tire disposal fee imposed pursuant to section 44-1302. M. There shall be deducted from the tax base the amount received from sales of solar energy devices. The retailer shall register with the department as a solar energy retailer. By registering, the retailer acknowledges that it will make its books and records relating to sales of solar energy devices available to the department for examination. N. In computing the tax base in the case of the sale or transfer of wireless telecommunications equipment as an inducement to a customer to enter into or continue a contract for telecommunications services that are taxable under section 42-5064, gross proceeds of sales or gross income does not include any sales commissions or other compensation received by the retailer as a result of the customer entering into or continuing a contract for the telecommunications services. O. For the purposes of this section, a sale of wireless telecommunications equipment to a person who holds the equipment for sale or transfer to a customer as an inducement to enter into or continue a contract for telecommunications services that are taxable under section 42-5064 is considered to be a sale for resale in the regular course of business. P. Retail sales of prepaid calling cards or prepaid authorization numbers for telecommunications services, including sales of reauthorization of a prepaid card or authorization number, are subject to tax under this section. Q. For the purposes of this section, the diversion of gas from a pipeline by a person engaged in the business of: 1. Operating a natural or artificial gas pipeline, for the sole purpose of fueling compressor equipment to pressurize the pipeline, is not a sale of the gas to the operator of the pipeline. 2. Converting natural gas into liquefied natural gas, for the sole purpose of fueling compressor equipment used in the conversion process, is not a sale of gas to the operator of the compressor equipment. R. For the purposes of this section, the transfer of title or possession of coal from an owner or operator of a power plant to a person in the business of refining coal is not a sale of coal if both of the following apply: 1. The transfer of title or possession of the coal is for the purpose of refining the coal. 2. The title or possession of the coal is transferred back to the owner or operator of the power plant after completion of the coal refining process. For the purposes of this paragraph, "coal refining process" means the application of a coal additive system that aids in the reduction of power plant emissions during the combustion of coal and the treatment of flue gas. S. If a seller is entitled to a deduction pursuant to subsection B, paragraph 16, subdivision (b) of this section, the department may require the purchaser to establish that the requirements of subsection B, paragraph 16, subdivision (b) of this section have been satisfied. If the purchaser cannot establish that the requirements of subsection B, paragraph 16, subdivision (b) of this section have been satisfied, the purchaser is liable in an amount equal to any tax, penalty and interest that the seller would have been required to pay under article 1 of this chapter if the seller had not made a deduction pursuant to subsection B, paragraph 16, subdivision (b) of this section. Payment of the amount under this subsection exempts the purchaser from liability for any tax imposed under article 4 of this chapter and related to the tangible personal property purchased. The amount shall be treated as transaction privilege tax to the purchaser and as tax revenues collected from the seller to designate the distribution base pursuant to section 42-5029. T. For the purposes of section 42-5032.01, the department shall separately account for revenues collected under the retail classification from businesses selling tangible personal property at retail: 1. On the premises of a multipurpose facility that is owned, leased or operated by the tourism and sports authority pursuant to title 5, chapter 8. 2. At professional football contests that are held in a stadium located on the campus of an institution under the jurisdiction of the Arizona board of regents. U. For the purposes of section 42-5032.03 and subject to section 48-4238, beginning October 1, 2025 and each month thereafter through December 31, 2055, the department shall separately account for revenues collected under the retail classification from each business selling tangible personal property at retail on the premises of a major league baseball facility or an adjacent building that is owned by a county stadium district pursuant to title 48, chapter 26 and operated by the county stadium district or the professional baseball franchise organization that occupies the major league baseball facility or adjacent building. For the purposes of this subsection, "adjacent building" and "major league baseball facility" have the same meanings prescribed in section 48-4201. V. In computing the tax base for the sale of a motor vehicle to a nonresident of this state, if the purchaser's state of residence allows a corresponding use tax exemption to the tax imposed by article 1 of this chapter and the rate of the tax in the purchaser's state of residence is lower than the rate prescribed in article 1 of this chapter or if the purchaser's state of residence does not impose an excise tax, and the nonresident has secured a special ninety day nonresident registration permit for the vehicle as prescribed by sections 28-2154 and 28-2154.01, there shall be deducted from the tax base a portion of the gross proceeds or gross income from the sale so that the amount of transaction privilege tax that is paid in this state is equal to the excise tax that is imposed by the purchaser's state of residence on the nonexempt sale or use of the motor vehicle. W. For the purposes of this section: 1. "Agricultural aircraft" means an aircraft that is built for agricultural use for the aerial application of pesticides or fertilizer or for aerial seeding. 2. "Aircraft" includes: (a) An airplane flight simulator that is approved by the federal aviation administration for use as a phase II or higher flight simulator under appendix H, 14 Code of Federal Regulations part 121. (b) Tangible personal property that is permanently affixed or attached as a component part of an aircraft that is owned or operated by a certificated or licensed carrier of persons or property. 3. "Other accessories and related equipment" includes aircraft accessories and equipment such as ground service equipment that physically contact aircraft at some point during the overall carrier operation. 4. "Selling at retail" means a sale for any purpose other than for resale in the regular course of business in the form of tangible personal property, but transfer of possession, lease and rental as used in the definition of sale mean only such transactions as are found on investigation to be in lieu of sales as defined without the words lease or rental. X. For the purposes of subsection I of this section: 1. "Assembler" means a person who unites or combines products, wares or articles of manufacture so as to produce a change in form or substance without changing or altering the component parts. 2. "Manufacturer" means a person who is principally engaged in fabricating, producing or manufacturing products, wares or articles for use from raw or prepared materials, imparting to those materials new forms, qualities, properties and combinations. 3. "Modifier" means a person who reworks, changes or adds to products, wares or articles of manufacture. 4. "Overhead materials" means tangible personal property, the gross proceeds of sales or gross income derived from that would otherwise be included in the retail classification, and that are used or consumed in performing a contract, the cost of which is charged to an overhead expense account and allocated to various contracts based on generally accepted accounting principles and consistent with government contract accounting standards. 5. "Repairer" means a person who restores or renews products, wares or articles of manufacture. 6. "Subcontract" means an agreement between a contractor and any person who is not an employee of the contractor for furnishing supplies or services that, in whole or in part, are necessary to perform one or more government contracts, or under which any portion of the contractor's obligation under one or more government contracts is performed, undertaken or assumed and that includes provisions causing title to overhead materials or other tangible personal property used in performing the subcontract to pass to the government or that includes provisions incorporating such title passing clauses in a government contract into the subcontract. END_STATUTE Sec. 9. Section 42-5070, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE42-5070. Transient lodging classification; definition A. The transient lodging classification is comprised of the business of operating, for occupancy by transients, a hotel or motel, including an inn, tourist home or house, dude ranch, resort, campground, studio or bachelor hotel, lodging house, rooming house, apartment house, dormitory, public or private club, mobile home or house trailer at a fixed location or other similar structure, and also including a space, lot or slab that is occupied or intended or designed for occupancy by transients in a mobile home or house trailer furnished by them for such occupancy. B. The transient lodging classification does not include: 1. Operating a convalescent home or facility, home for the aged, hospital, jail, military installation or fraternity or sorority house or operating any structure exclusively by an association, institution, governmental agency or corporation for religious, charitable or educational purposes, if no part of the net earnings of the association, corporation or other entity inures to the benefit of any private shareholder or individual. 2. A lease or rental of a mobile home or house trailer at a fixed location or any other similar structure, and also including a space, lot or slab that is occupied or intended or designed for occupancy by transients in a mobile home or house trailer furnished by them for such occupancy for thirty or more consecutive days. 3. Leasing or renting four or fewer rooms of an owner-occupied residential home, together with furnishing no not more than a breakfast meal, to transient lodgers at no not more than a fifty percent average annual occupancy rate. 4. The activities of any online lodging marketplace, as defined in section 42-5076. C. The tax base for the transient lodging classification is the gross proceeds of sales or gross income derived from the business, except that the tax base does not include: 1. the gross proceeds of sales or gross income derived from business activity that is properly included in another business classification under this article and that is taxable to the person engaged in that business classification, but the gross proceeds of sales or gross income to be deducted shall not exceed the consideration paid to the person conducting the activity. 2. The gross proceeds or gross income received by an online lodging operator, as defined in section 42-5076, from any online lodging transactions, as defined in section 42-5076, for which the online lodging operator has received documentation from a registered online lodging marketplace, as defined in section 42-5076, pursuant to section 42-5009, subsection P that the online lodging marketplace has remitted or will remit the applicable tax to the department pursuant to section 42-5014, subsection E. D. For the purposes of this section, the tax base for the transient lodging classification does not include gross proceeds of sales or gross income derived from: 1. Transactions or activities that are not limited to transients and that would not be taxable if engaged in by a person not subject to tax under this article. 2. Transactions or activities that are not limited to transients and that would not be taxable if engaged in by a person subject to taxation under section 42-5062 or 42-5073 due to an exclusion, exemption or deduction. 3. Commissions paid to a person that is engaged in transient lodging business subject to taxation under this section by a person providing services or property to the customers of the person engaging in the transient lodging business. E. The department shall separately account for revenues collected under the transient lodging classification for the purposes of section 42-5029, subsection D, paragraph 4, subdivision (b). F. For the purposes of this section, "transient" means any person who either at the person's own expense or at the expense of another obtains lodging space or the use of lodging space on a daily or weekly basis, or on any other basis for less than thirty consecutive days. END_STATUTE Sec. 10. Section 42-5071, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE42-5071. Personal property rental classification; definitions A. The personal property rental classification is comprised of the business of leasing or renting tangible personal property for a consideration and includes peer-to-peer car sharing. The tax does not apply to: 1. Leasing or renting films, tapes or slides used by theaters or movies, which are engaged in business under the amusement classification, or used by television stations or radio stations. 2. Activities engaged in by the Arizona exposition and state fair board or county fair commissions in connection with events sponsored by such entities. 3. Leasing or renting tangible personal property by a parent business entity to a subsidiary business entity or by a subsidiary business entity to another subsidiary of the same parent business entity if taxes were paid under this chapter on the gross proceeds or gross income accruing from the initial sale of the tangible personal property.  For the purposes of this paragraph, "subsidiary" means a business entity of which at least eighty percent of the voting shares are owned by the parent business entity. 4. Operating coin-operated washing, drying and dry cleaning machines or coin-operated car washing machines at establishments for the use of such machines. 5. Leasing or renting tangible personal property for incorporation into or comprising any part of a qualified environmental technology facility as described in section 41-1514.02. This paragraph shall apply for ten full consecutive calendar or fiscal years following the initial lease or rental by each qualified environmental technology manufacturer, producer or processor. 6. Leasing or renting aircraft, flight simulators or similar training equipment to students or staff by nonprofit, accredited educational institutions that offer associate or baccalaureate degrees in aviation or aerospace related fields. 7. Leasing or renting photographs, transparencies or other creative works used by this state on internet websites, in magazines or in other publications that encourage tourism. 8. Leasing or renting certified ignition interlock devices installed pursuant to the requirements prescribed by section 28-1461. For the purposes of this paragraph, "certified ignition interlock device" has the same meaning prescribed in section 28-1301. 9. The Leasing or renting of space to make attachments to utility poles, as follows: (a) By a person that is engaged in business under section 42-5063 or 42-5064 or that is a cable operator. (b) To a person that is engaged in business under section 42-5063 or 42-5064 or that is a cable operator. 10. Leasing or renting billboards that are designed, intended or used to advertise or inform and that are visible from any street, road or other highway. B. The tax base for the personal property rental classification is the gross proceeds of sales or gross income derived from the business, but the gross proceeds of sales or gross income derived from the following shall be deducted from the tax base: 1. Reimbursements by the lessee to the lessor of a motor vehicle for payments by the lessor of the applicable fees and taxes imposed by sections 28-2003, 28-2352, 28-2402, 28-2481 and 28-5801, title 28, chapter 15, article 2 and article IX, section 11, Constitution of Arizona, to the extent such amounts are separately identified as such fees and taxes and are billed to the lessee. 2. Leases or rentals of tangible personal property that, if it had been purchased instead of leased or rented by the lessee, would have been exempt under: (a) Section 42-5061, subsection A, paragraph 8, 9, 12, 13, 25, 29, 49 or 53. (b) Section 42-5061, subsection B. (c) Section 42-5061, subsection I, paragraph 1. (d) Section 42-5061, subsection M. 3. Motor vehicle fuel and use fuel that are subject to a tax imposed under title 28, chapter 16, article 1, sales of use fuel to a holder of a valid single trip use fuel tax permit issued under section 28-5739 and sales of aviation fuel that are subject to the tax imposed under section 28-8344. 4. Leasing or renting a motor vehicle subject to and on which the fee has been paid under title 28, chapter 16, article 4. 5. Amounts received by a motor vehicle dealer for the first month of a lease payment if the lease and the lease payment for the first month of the lease are transferred to a third-party leasing company. C. Sales of tangible personal property to be leased or rented to a person engaged in a business classified under the personal property rental classification are deemed to be resale sales. D. In computing the tax base, the gross proceeds of sales or gross income from the lease or rental of a motor vehicle does not include any amount attributable to the car rental surcharge under section 5-839, 28-5810 or 48-4234. E. Until December 31, 1988, leasing or renting animals for recreational purposes is exempt from the tax imposed by this section. Beginning January 1, 1989, the gross proceeds or gross income from leasing or renting animals for recreational purposes is subject to taxation under this section. Tax liabilities, penalties and interest paid for taxable periods before January 1, 1989 shall not be refunded unless the taxpayer requesting the refund provides proof satisfactory to the department that the monies paid as taxes will be returned to the customer. F. The tax base of the personal property rental classification does not include the gross proceeds or gross income received by a shared vehicle owner from a peer-to-peer car sharing program pursuant to section 42-5009, subsection R  q. G. For the purposes of this section: 1. "Cable operator" has the same meaning prescribed in section 9-505 and includes a video service provider. 2. "Peer-to-peer car sharing" has the same meaning prescribed in section 28-9601. 3. "Peer-to-peer car sharing program" has the same meaning prescribed in section 28-9601. 4. "Shared vehicle owner" has the same meaning prescribed in section 28-9601. 5. "Utility pole" means any wooden, metal or other pole used for utility purposes and the pole's appurtenances that are attached or authorized for attachment by the person controlling the pole. END_STATUTE Sec. 11. Repeal Section 42-5076, Arizona Revised Statutes, is repealed. Sec. 12. Section 42-5159, Arizona Revised Statutes, as amended by Laws 2025, chapter 135, section 2 and chapter 247, section 2, is amended to read: START_STATUTE42-5159. Exemptions A. The tax levied by this article does not apply to the storage, use or consumption in this state of the following described tangible personal property: 1. Tangible personal property, sold in this state, the gross receipts from the sale of which are included in the measure of the tax imposed by articles 1 and 2 of this chapter. 2. Tangible personal property, the sale or use of which has already been subjected to an excise tax at a rate equal to or exceeding the tax imposed by this article under the laws of another state of the United States. If the excise tax imposed by the other state is at a rate less than the tax imposed by this article, the tax imposed by this article is reduced by the amount of the tax already imposed by the other state. 3. Tangible personal property, the storage, use or consumption of which the constitution or laws of the United States prohibit this state from taxing or to the extent that the rate or imposition of tax is unconstitutional under the laws of the United States. 4. Tangible personal property that directly enters into and becomes an ingredient or component part of any manufactured, fabricated or processed article, substance or commodity for sale in the regular course of business. 5. Motor vehicle fuel and use fuel, the sales, distribution or use of which in this state is subject to the tax imposed under title 28, chapter 16, article 1, use fuel that is sold to or used by a person holding a valid single trip use fuel tax permit issued under section 28-5739, aviation fuel, the sales, distribution or use of which in this state is subject to the tax imposed under section 28-8344, and jet fuel, the sales, distribution or use of which in this state is subject to the tax imposed under article 8 of this chapter. 6. Tangible personal property brought into this state by an individual who was a nonresident at the time the property was purchased for storage, use or consumption by the individual if the first actual use or consumption of the property was outside this state, unless the property is used in conducting a business in this state. 7. Purchases of implants used as growth promotants and injectable medicines, not already exempt under paragraph 16 of this subsection, for livestock and poultry owned by, or in possession of, persons who are engaged in producing livestock, poultry, or livestock or poultry products, or who are engaged in feeding livestock or poultry commercially. For the purposes of this paragraph, "poultry" includes ratites. 8. Purchases of: (a) Livestock and poultry to persons engaging in the businesses of farming, ranching or producing livestock or poultry. (b) Livestock and poultry feed, salts, vitamins and other additives sold to persons for use or consumption in the businesses of farming, ranching and producing or feeding livestock or poultry or for use or consumption in noncommercial boarding of livestock. For the purposes of this paragraph, "poultry" includes ratites. 9. Propagative materials for use in commercially producing agricultural, horticultural, viticultural or floricultural crops in this state. For the purposes of this paragraph, "propagative materials": (a) Includes seeds, seedlings, roots, bulbs, liners, transplants, cuttings, soil and plant additives, agricultural minerals, auxiliary soil and plant substances, micronutrients, fertilizers, insecticides, herbicides, fungicides, soil fumigants, desiccants, rodenticides, adjuvants, plant nutrients and plant growth regulators. (b) Except for use in commercially producing industrial hemp as defined in section 3-311, does not include any propagative materials used in producing any part, including seeds, of any plant of the genus cannabis. 10. Tangible personal property not exceeding $200 in any one month purchased by an individual at retail outside the continental limits of the United States for the individual's own personal use and enjoyment. 11. Advertising supplements that are intended for sale with newspapers published in this state and that have already been subjected to an excise tax under the laws of another state in the United States that equals or exceeds the tax imposed by this article. 12. Materials that are purchased by or for publicly funded libraries, including school district libraries, charter school libraries, community college libraries, state university libraries or federal, state, county or municipal libraries, for use by the public as follows: (a) Printed or photographic materials, beginning August 7, 1985. (b) Electronic or digital media materials, beginning July 17, 1994. 13. Tangible personal property purchased by: (a) A hospital organized and operated exclusively for charitable purposes, no part of the net earnings of which inures to the benefit of any private shareholder or individual. (b) A hospital operated by this state or a political subdivision of this state. (c) A licensed nursing care institution or a licensed residential care institution or a residential care facility operated in conjunction with a licensed nursing care institution or a licensed kidney dialysis center, which provides medical services, nursing services or health related services and is not used or held for profit. (d) A qualifying health care organization, as defined in section 42-5001, if the tangible personal property is used by the organization solely to provide health and medical related educational and charitable services. (e) A qualifying health care organization as defined in section 42-5001 if the organization is dedicated to providing educational, therapeutic, rehabilitative and family medical education training for blind and visually impaired children and children with multiple disabilities from the time of birth to age twenty-one. (f) A nonprofit charitable organization that has qualified under section 501(c)(3) of the United States internal revenue code and that engages in and uses such property exclusively in programs for persons with mental or physical disabilities if the programs are exclusively for training, job placement, rehabilitation, or testing. (g) A person that is subject to tax under this chapter by reason of being engaged in business classified under section 42-5075, or a subcontractor working under the control of a person that is engaged in business classified under section 42-5075, if the tangible personal property is any of the following: (i) Incorporated or fabricated by the person into a structure, project, development or improvement in fulfillment of a contract. (ii) Incorporated or fabricated by the person into any project described in section 42-5075, subsection O  P. (iii) Used in environmental response or remediation activities under section 42-5075, subsection B, paragraph 6. (h) A person that is not subject to tax under section 42-5075 and that has been provided a copy of a certificate described in section 42-5009, subsection L, if the property purchased is incorporated or fabricated by the person into the real property, structure, project, development or improvement described in the certificate. (i) A nonprofit charitable organization that has qualified under section 501(c)(3) of the internal revenue code if the property is purchased from the parent or an affiliate organization that is located outside this state. (j) A qualifying community health center as defined in section 42-5001. (k) A nonprofit charitable organization that has qualified under section 501(c)(3) of the internal revenue code and that regularly serves meals to the needy and indigent on a continuing basis at no cost. (l) A person engaged in business under the transient lodging classification if the property is a personal hygiene item or articles used by human beings for food, drink or condiment, except alcoholic beverages, which are furnished without additional charge to and intended to be consumed by the transient during the transient's occupancy. (m) For taxable periods beginning from and after June 30, 2001, a nonprofit charitable organization that has qualified under section 501(c)(3) of the internal revenue code and that provides residential apartment housing for low-income persons over sixty-two years of age in a facility that qualifies for a federal housing subsidy, if the tangible personal property is used by the organization solely to provide residential apartment housing for low-income persons over sixty-two years of age in a facility that qualifies for a federal housing subsidy. (n) A qualifying health sciences educational institution as defined in section 42-5001. (o) A person representing or working on behalf of any person described in subdivision (a), (b), (c), (d), (e), (f), (i), (j), (k), (m) or (n) of this paragraph, if the tangible personal property is incorporated or fabricated into a project described in section 42-5075, subsection O  P. 14. Commodities, as defined by title 7 United States Code section 2, that are consigned for resale in a warehouse in this state in or from which the commodity is deliverable on a contract for future delivery subject to the rules of a commodity market regulated by the United States commodity futures trading commission. 15. Tangible personal property sold by: (a) Any nonprofit organization organized and operated exclusively for charitable purposes and recognized by the United States internal revenue service under section 501(c)(3) of the internal revenue code. (b) A nonprofit organization that is exempt from taxation under section 501(c)(3), 501(c)(4) or 501(c)(6) of the internal revenue code if the organization is associated with a major league baseball team or a national touring professional golfing association and no part of the organization's net earnings inures to the benefit of any private shareholder or individual. This subdivision does not apply to an organization that is owned, managed or controlled, in whole or in part, by a major league baseball team, or its owners, officers, employees or agents, or by a major league baseball association or professional golfing association, or its owners, officers, employees or agents, unless the organization conducted or operated exhibition events in this state before January 1, 2018 that were exempt from transaction privilege tax under section 42-5073. (c) A nonprofit organization that is exempt from taxation under section 501(c)(3), 501(c)(4), 501(c)(6), 501(c)(7) or 501(c)(8) of the internal revenue code if the organization sponsors or operates a rodeo featuring primarily farm and ranch animals and no part of the organization's net earnings inures to the benefit of any private shareholder or individual. 16. Drugs and medical oxygen, including delivery hose, mask or tent, regulator and tank, if prescribed by a member of the medical, dental or veterinarian profession who is licensed by law to administer such substances. 17. Prosthetic appliances, as defined in section 23-501, prescribed or recommended by a person who is licensed, registered or otherwise professionally credentialed as a physician, dentist, podiatrist, chiropractor, naturopath, homeopath, nurse or optometrist. 18. Prescription eyeglasses and contact lenses. 19. Insulin, insulin syringes and glucose test strips. 20. Hearing aids as defined in section 36-1901. 21. Durable medical equipment that has a centers for medicare and medicaid services common procedure code, is designated reimbursable by medicare, is prescribed by a person who is licensed under title 32, chapter 7, 13, 17 or 29, can withstand repeated use, is primarily and customarily used to serve a medical purpose, is generally not useful to a person in the absence of illness or injury and is appropriate for use in the home. 22. Food, as provided in and subject to the conditions of article 3 of this chapter and sections 42-5074 and 42-6017. 23. Items purchased with United States department of agriculture coupons issued under the supplemental nutrition assistance program pursuant to the food and nutrition act of 2008 (P.L. 88-525; 78 Stat. 703; 7 United States Code sections 2011 through 2036b) by the United States department of agriculture food and nutrition service or food instruments issued under section 17 of the child nutrition act (P.L. 95-627; 92 Stat. 3603; P.L. 99-661, section 4302; P.L. 111-296; 42 United States Code section 1786). 24. Food and drink provided without monetary charge by a taxpayer that is subject to section 42-5074 to its employees for their own consumption on the premises during the employees' hours of employment. 25. Tangible personal property that is used or consumed in a business subject to section 42-5074 for human food, drink or condiment, whether simple, mixed or compounded. 26. Food, drink or condiment and accessory tangible personal property that are acquired for use by or provided to a school district or charter school if they are to be either served or prepared and served to persons for consumption on the premises of a public school in the school district or on the premises of the charter school during school hours. 27. Lottery tickets or shares purchased pursuant to title 5, chapter 5.1, article 1. 28. Textbooks, sold by a bookstore, that are required by any state university or community college. 29. Magazines, other periodicals or other publications produced by this state to encourage tourist travel. 30. Paper machine clothing, such as forming fabrics and dryer felts, purchased by a paper manufacturer and directly used or consumed in paper manufacturing. 31. Coal, petroleum, coke, natural gas, virgin fuel oil and electricity purchased by a qualified environmental technology manufacturer, producer or processor as defined in section 41-1514.02 and directly used or consumed in generating or providing on-site power or energy solely for environmental technology manufacturing, producing or processing or environmental protection. This paragraph applies for twenty full consecutive calendar or fiscal years from the date the first paper manufacturing machine is placed in service. In the case of an environmental technology manufacturer, producer or processor that does not manufacture paper, the time period begins with the date the first manufacturing, processing or production equipment is placed in service. 32. Motor vehicles that are removed from inventory by a motor vehicle dealer as defined in section 28-4301 and that are provided to: (a) Charitable or educational institutions that are exempt from taxation under section 501(c)(3) of the internal revenue code. (b) Public educational institutions. (c) State universities or affiliated organizations of a state university if no part of the organization's net earnings inures to the benefit of any private shareholder or individual. 33. Natural gas or liquefied petroleum gas used to propel a motor vehicle. 34. Machinery, equipment, technology or related supplies that are only useful to assist a person with a physical disability as defined in section 46-191 or a person who has a developmental disability as defined in section 36-551 or has a head injury as defined in section 41-3201 to be more independent and functional. 35. Liquid, solid or gaseous chemicals used in manufacturing, processing, fabricating, mining, refining, metallurgical operations, research and development and, beginning on January 1, 1999, printing, if using or consuming the chemicals, alone or as part of an integrated system of chemicals, involves direct contact with the materials from which the product is produced for the purpose of causing or allowing a chemical or physical change to occur in the materials as part of the production process. This paragraph does not include chemicals that are used or consumed in activities such as packaging, storage or transportation but does not affect any exemption for such chemicals that is otherwise provided by this section. For the purposes of this paragraph, "printing" means a commercial printing operation and includes job printing, engraving, embossing, copying and bookbinding. 36. Food, drink and condiment purchased for consumption within the premises of any prison, jail or other institution under the jurisdiction of the state department of corrections, the department of public safety, the department of juvenile corrections or a county sheriff. 37. A motor vehicle and any repair and replacement parts and tangible personal property becoming a part of such motor vehicle sold to a motor carrier that is subject to a fee prescribed in title 28, chapter 16, article 4 and that is engaged in the business of leasing or renting such a property. 38. Tangible personal property that is or directly enters into and becomes an ingredient or component part of cards used as prescription plan identification cards. 39. Overhead materials or other tangible personal property that is used in performing a contract between the United States government and a manufacturer, modifier, assembler or repairer, including property used in performing a subcontract with a government contractor who is a manufacturer, modifier, assembler or repairer, to which title passes to the government under the terms of the contract or subcontract. For the purposes of this paragraph: (a) "Overhead materials" means tangible personal property, the gross proceeds of sales or gross income derived from which would otherwise be included in the retail classification, that is used or consumed in performing a contract, the cost of which is charged to an overhead expense account and allocated to various contracts based on generally accepted accounting principles and consistent with government contract accounting standards. (b) "Subcontract" means an agreement between a contractor and any person who is not an employee of the contractor for furnishing of supplies or services that, in whole or in part, are necessary to perform one or more government contracts, or under which any portion of the contractor's obligation under one or more government contracts is performed, undertaken or assumed, and that includes provisions causing title to overhead materials or other tangible personal property used in performing the subcontract to pass to the government or that includes provisions incorporating such title passing clauses in a government contract into the subcontract. 40. Through December 31, 1994, tangible personal property sold pursuant to a personal property liquidation transaction, as defined in section 42-5061. From and after December 31, 1994, tangible personal property sold pursuant to a personal property liquidation transaction, as defined in section 42-5061, if the gross proceeds of the sales were included in the measure of the tax imposed by article 1 of this chapter or if the personal property liquidation was a casual activity or transaction. 41. Wireless telecommunications equipment that is held for sale or transfer to a customer as an inducement to enter into or continue a contract for telecommunications services that are taxable under section 42-5064. 42. Alternative fuel, as defined in section 1-215, purchased by a used oil fuel burner who has received a permit to burn used oil or used oil fuel under section 49-426 or 49-480. 43. Tangible personal property purchased by a commercial airline and consisting of food, beverages and condiments and accessories used for serving the food and beverages, if those items are to be provided without additional charge to passengers for consumption in flight. For the purposes of this paragraph, "commercial airline" means a person holding a federal certificate of public convenience and necessity or foreign air carrier permit for air transportation to transport persons, property or United States mail in intrastate, interstate or foreign commerce. 44. Alternative fuel vehicles if the vehicle was manufactured as a diesel fuel vehicle and converted to operate on alternative fuel and equipment that is installed in a conventional diesel fuel motor vehicle to convert the vehicle to operate on an alternative fuel, as defined in section 1-215. 45. Gas diverted from a pipeline, by a person engaged in the business of: (a) Operating a natural or artificial gas pipeline, and used or consumed for the sole purpose of fueling compressor equipment that pressurizes the pipeline. (b) Converting natural gas into liquefied natural gas, and used or consumed for the sole purpose of fueling compressor equipment used in the conversion process. 46. Tangible personal property that is excluded, exempt or deductible from transaction privilege tax pursuant to section 42-5063. 47. Tangible personal property purchased to be incorporated or installed as part of environmental response or remediation activities under section 42-5075, subsection B, paragraph 6. 48. Tangible personal property sold by a nonprofit organization that is exempt from taxation under section 501(c)(6) of the internal revenue code if the organization produces, organizes or promotes cultural or civic related festivals or events and no part of the organization's net earnings inures to the benefit of any private shareholder or individual. 49. Prepared food, drink or condiment donated by a restaurant as classified in section 42-5074, subsection A to a nonprofit charitable organization that has qualified under section 501(c)(3) of the internal revenue code and that regularly serves meals to the needy and indigent on a continuing basis at no cost. 50. Application services that are designed to assess or test student learning or to promote curriculum design or enhancement purchased by or for any school district, charter school, community college or state university. For the purposes of this paragraph: (a) "Application services" means software applications provided remotely using hypertext transfer protocol or another network protocol. (b) "Curriculum design or enhancement" means planning, implementing or reporting on courses of study, lessons, assignments or other learning activities. 51. Motor vehicle fuel and use fuel to a qualified business under section 41-1516 for off-road use in harvesting, processing or transporting qualifying forest products removed from qualifying projects as defined in section 41-1516. 52. Repair parts installed in equipment used directly by a qualified business under section 41-1516 in harvesting, processing or transporting qualifying forest products removed from qualifying projects as defined in section 41-1516. 53. Renewable energy credits or any other unit created to track energy derived from renewable energy resources. For the purposes of this paragraph, "renewable energy credit" means a unit created administratively by the corporation commission or governing body of a public power entity to track kilowatt hours of electricity derived from a renewable energy resource or the kilowatt hour equivalent of conventional energy resources displaced by distributed renewable energy resources. 54. Coal acquired from an owner or operator of a power plant by a person that is responsible for refining coal if both of the following apply: (a) The transfer of title or possession of the coal is for the purpose of refining the coal. (b) The title or possession of the coal is transferred back to the owner or operator of the power plant after completion of the coal refining process. For the purposes of this subdivision, "coal refining process" means the application of a coal additive system that aids the reduction of power plant emissions during the combustion of coal and the treatment of flue gas. 55. Tangible personal property incorporated or fabricated into a project described in section 42-5075, subsection O  P, that is located within the exterior boundaries of an Indian reservation for which the owner, as defined in section 42-5075, of the project is an Indian tribe or an affiliated Indian. For the purposes of this paragraph: (a) "Affiliated Indian" means an individual Native American Indian who is duly registered on the tribal rolls of the Indian tribe for whose benefit the Indian reservation was established. (b) "Indian reservation" means all lands that are within the limits of areas set aside by the United States for the exclusive use and occupancy of an Indian tribe by treaty, law or executive order and that are recognized as Indian reservations by the United States department of the interior. (c) "Indian tribe" means any organized nation, tribe, band or community that is recognized as an Indian tribe by the United States department of the interior and includes any entity formed under the laws of the Indian tribe. 56. Cash equivalents, precious metal bullion and monetized bullion purchased by the ultimate consumer, but coins or other forms of money for manufacture into jewelry or works of art are subject to tax, and tangible personal property that is purchased through the redemption of any cash equivalent by the holder as a means of payment for goods that are subject to tax under this article is subject to tax. For the purposes of this paragraph: (a) "Cash equivalents" means items, whether or not negotiable, that are sold to one or more persons, through which a value denominated in money is purchased in advance and that may be redeemed in full or in part for tangible personal property, intangibles or services. Cash equivalents include gift cards, stored value cards, gift certificates, vouchers, traveler's checks, money orders or other tangible instruments or orders. Cash equivalents do not include either of the following: (i) Items that are sold to one or more persons and through which a value is not denominated in money. (ii) Prepaid calling cards for telecommunications services. (b) "Monetized bullion" means coins and other forms of money that are manufactured from gold, silver or other metals and that have been or are used as a medium of exchange in this or another state, the United States or a foreign nation. (c) "Precious metal bullion" means precious metal, including gold, silver, platinum, rhodium and palladium, that has been smelted or refined so that its value depends on its contents and not on its form. B. In addition to the exemptions allowed by subsection A of this section, the following categories of tangible personal property are also exempt: 1. Machinery, or equipment, used directly in manufacturing, processing, fabricating, job printing, refining or metallurgical operations. The terms "manufacturing", "processing", "fabricating", "job printing", "refining" and "metallurgical" as used in this paragraph refer to and include those operations commonly understood within their ordinary meaning. "Metallurgical operations" includes leaching, milling, precipitating, smelting and refining. 2. Machinery, or equipment, used directly in the process of extracting ores or minerals from the earth for commercial purposes, including equipment required to prepare the materials for extraction and handling, loading or transporting such extracted material to the surface.  "Mining" includes underground, surface and open pit operations for extracting ores and minerals. 3. Tangible personal property sold to persons engaged in business classified under the telecommunications classification under section 42-5064, including a person representing or working on behalf of such a person in a manner described in section 42-5075, subsection O  P, and consisting of central office switching equipment, switchboards, private branch exchange equipment, microwave radio equipment and carrier equipment including optical fiber, coaxial cable and other transmission media that are components of carrier systems. 4. Machinery, equipment or transmission lines used directly in producing or transmitting electrical power, but not including distribution.  Transformers and control equipment used at transmission substation sites constitute equipment used in producing or transmitting electrical power. 5. Machinery and equipment used directly for energy storage for later electrical use. For the purposes of this paragraph: (a) "Electric utility scale" means a person that is engaged in a business activity described in section 42-5063, subsection A or such person's equipment or wholesale electricity suppliers. (b) "Energy storage" means commercially available technology for electric utility scale that is capable of absorbing energy, storing energy for a period of time and thereafter dispatching the energy and that uses mechanical, chemical or thermal processes to store energy. (c) "Machinery and equipment used directly" means all machinery and equipment that are used for electric energy storage from the point of receipt of such energy in order to facilitate storage of the electric energy to the point where the electric energy is released. 6. Neat animals, horses, asses, sheep, ratites, swine or goats used or to be used as breeding or production stock, including sales of breedings or ownership shares in such animals used for breeding or production. 7. Pipes or valves four inches in diameter or larger used to transport oil, natural gas, artificial gas, water, wastewater or coal slurry, including compressor units, regulators, machinery and equipment, fittings, seals and any other part that is used in operating the pipes or valves. 8. Aircraft, navigational and communication instruments and other accessories and related equipment sold to: (a) A person: (i) Holding, or exempted by federal law from obtaining, a federal certificate of public convenience and necessity for use as, in conjunction with or becoming part of an aircraft to be used to transport persons for hire in intrastate, interstate or foreign commerce. (ii) That is certificated or licensed under federal aviation administration regulations (14 Code of Federal Regulations part 121 or 135) as a scheduled or unscheduled carrier of persons for hire for use as or in conjunction with or becoming part of an aircraft to be used to transport persons for hire in intrastate, interstate or foreign commerce. (iii) Holding a foreign air carrier permit for air transportation for use as or in conjunction with or becoming a part of aircraft to be used to transport persons, property or United States mail in intrastate, interstate or foreign commerce. (iv) Operating an aircraft to transport persons in any manner for compensation or hire, or for use in a fractional ownership program that meets the requirements of federal aviation administration regulations (14 Code of Federal Regulations part 91, subpart K), including as an air carrier, a foreign air carrier or a commercial operator or under a restricted category, within the meaning of 14 Code of Federal Regulations, regardless of whether the operation or aircraft is regulated or certified under part 91, 119, 121, 133, 135, 136 or 137, or another part of 14 Code of Federal Regulations. (v) That will lease or otherwise transfer operational control, within the meaning of federal aviation administration operations specification A008, or its successor, of the aircraft, instruments or accessories to one or more persons described in item (i), (ii), (iii) or (iv) of this subdivision, subject to section 42-5009, subsection Q  P. (b) Any foreign government. (c) Persons who are not residents of this state and who will not use such property in this state other than in removing such property from this state. This subdivision also applies to corporations that are not incorporated in this state, regardless of maintaining a place of business in this state, if the principal corporate office is located outside this state and the property will not be used in this state other than in removing the property from this state. 9. Machinery, tools, equipment and related supplies used or consumed directly in repairing, remodeling or maintaining aircraft, aircraft engines or aircraft component parts by or on behalf of a certificated or licensed carrier of persons or property. 10. Rolling stock, rails, ties and signal control equipment used directly to transport persons or property. 11. Machinery or equipment used directly to drill for oil or gas or used directly in the process of extracting oil or gas from the earth for commercial purposes. 12. Buses or other urban mass transit vehicles that are used directly to transport persons or property for hire or pursuant to a governmentally adopted and controlled urban mass transportation program and that are sold to bus companies holding a federal certificate of convenience and necessity or operated by any city, town or other governmental entity or by any person contracting with such governmental entity as part of a governmentally adopted and controlled program to provide urban mass transportation. 13. Groundwater measuring devices required under section 45-604. 14. Machinery and equipment consisting of agricultural aircraft, tractors, off-highway vehicles, tractor-drawn implements, self-powered implements, machinery and equipment necessary for extracting milk, and machinery and equipment necessary for cooling milk and livestock, and drip irrigation lines not already exempt under paragraph 7 of this subsection and that are used for commercially producing agricultural, horticultural, viticultural and floricultural crops and products in this state. For the purposes of this paragraph: (a) "Off-highway vehicles" means off-highway vehicles as defined in section 28-1171 that are modified at the time of sale to function as a tractor or to tow tractor-drawn implements and that are not equipped with a modified exhaust system to increase horsepower or speed or an engine that is more than one thousand cubic centimeters or that have a maximum speed of fifty miles per hour or less. (b) "Self-powered implements" includes machinery and equipment that are electric-powered. 15. Machinery or equipment used in research and development. For the purposes of this paragraph, "research and development" means basic and applied research in the sciences and engineering, and designing, developing or testing prototypes, processes or new products, including research and development of computer software that is embedded in or an integral part of the prototype or new product or that is required for machinery or equipment otherwise exempt under this section to function effectively. Research and development do not include manufacturing quality control, routine consumer product testing, market research, sales promotion, sales service, research in social sciences or psychology, computer software research that is not included in the definition of research and development, or other nontechnological activities or technical services. 16. Tangible personal property that is used by either of the following to receive, store, convert, produce, generate, decode, encode, control or transmit telecommunications information: (a) Any direct broadcast satellite television or data transmission service that operates pursuant to 47 Code of Federal Regulations part 25. (b) Any satellite television or data transmission facility, if both of the following conditions are met: (i) Over two-thirds of the transmissions, measured in megabytes, transmitted by the facility during the test period were transmitted to or on behalf of one or more direct broadcast satellite television or data transmission services that operate pursuant to 47 Code of Federal Regulations part 25. (ii) Over two-thirds of the transmissions, measured in megabytes, transmitted by or on behalf of those direct broadcast television or data transmission services during the test period were transmitted by the facility to or on behalf of those services. For the purposes of subdivision (b) of this paragraph, "test period" means the three hundred sixty-five day period beginning on the later of the date on which the tangible personal property is purchased or the date on which the direct broadcast satellite television or data transmission service first transmits information to its customers. 17. Clean rooms that are used for manufacturing, processing, fabrication or research and development, as defined in paragraph 15 of this subsection, of semiconductor products. For the purposes of this paragraph, "clean room" means all property that comprises or creates an environment where humidity, temperature, particulate matter and contamination are precisely controlled within specified parameters, without regard to whether the property is actually contained within that environment or whether any of the property is affixed to or incorporated into real property. Clean room: (a) Includes the integrated systems, fixtures, piping, movable partitions, lighting and all property that is necessary or adapted to reduce contamination or to control airflow, temperature, humidity, chemical purity or other environmental conditions or manufacturing tolerances, as well as the production machinery and equipment operating in conjunction with the clean room environment. (b) Does not include the building or other permanent, nonremovable component of the building that houses the clean room environment. 18. Machinery and equipment that are used directly in feeding poultry, environmentally controlling housing for poultry, moving eggs within a production and packaging facility or sorting or cooling eggs.  This exemption does not apply to vehicles used for transporting eggs. 19. Machinery or equipment, including related structural components and containment structures, that is employed in connection with manufacturing, processing, fabricating, job printing, refining, mining, natural gas pipelines, metallurgical operations, telecommunications, producing or transmitting electricity or research and development and that is used directly to meet or exceed rules or regulations adopted by the federal energy regulatory commission, the United States environmental protection agency, the United States nuclear regulatory commission, the Arizona department of environmental quality or a political subdivision of this state to prevent, monitor, control or reduce land, water or air pollution. For the purposes of this paragraph, "containment structure" means a structure that prevents, monitors, controls or reduces noxious or harmful discharge into the environment. 20. Machinery and equipment that are used in commercially producing livestock, livestock products or agricultural, horticultural, viticultural or floricultural crops or products in this state, including production by a person representing or working on behalf of such a person in a manner described in section 42-5075, subsection O  P, if the machinery and equipment are used directly and primarily to prevent, monitor, control or reduce air, water or land pollution. 21. Machinery or equipment that enables a television station to originate and broadcast or to receive and broadcast digital television signals and that was purchased to facilitate compliance with the telecommunications act of 1996 (P.L. 104-104; 110 Stat. 56; 47 United States Code section 336) and the federal communications commission order issued April 21, 1997 (47 Code of Federal Regulations part 73). This paragraph does not exempt any of the following: (a) Repair or replacement parts purchased for the machinery or equipment described in this paragraph. (b) Machinery or equipment purchased to replace machinery or equipment for which an exemption was previously claimed and taken under this paragraph. (c) Any machinery or equipment purchased after the television station has ceased analog broadcasting, or purchased after November 1, 2009, whichever occurs first. 22. Qualifying equipment that is purchased from and after June 30, 2004 through December 31, 2028 by a qualified business under section 41-1516 for harvesting or processing qualifying forest products removed from qualifying projects as defined in section 41-1516. To qualify for this exemption, the qualified business must obtain and present its certification from the Arizona commerce authority at the time of purchase. 23. Machinery, equipment, materials and other tangible personal property used directly and predominantly to construct a qualified environmental technology manufacturing, producing or processing facility as described in section 41-1514.02. This paragraph applies for ten full consecutive calendar or fiscal years after the start of initial construction. 24. Computer data center equipment sold to the owner, operator or qualified colocation tenant of a computer data center that is certified by the Arizona commerce authority under section 41-1519 or an authorized agent of the owner, operator or qualified colocation tenant during the qualification period for use in the qualified computer data center. For the purposes of this paragraph, "computer data center", "computer data center equipment", "qualification period" and "qualified colocation tenant" have the same meanings prescribed in section 41-1519. C. The exemptions provided by subsection B of this section do not include: 1. Expendable materials. For the purposes of this paragraph, expendable materials do not include any of the categories of tangible personal property specified in subsection B of this section regardless of the cost or useful life of that property. 2. Janitorial equipment and hand tools. 3. Office equipment, furniture and supplies. 4. Tangible personal property used in selling or distributing activities, other than the telecommunications transmissions described in subsection B, paragraph 16 of this section. 5. Motor vehicles required to be licensed by this state, except buses or other urban mass transit vehicles specifically exempted pursuant to subsection B, paragraph 12 of this section, without regard to the use of such motor vehicles. 6. Shops, buildings, docks, depots and all other materials of whatever kind or character not specifically included as exempt. 7. Motors and pumps used in drip irrigation systems. 8. Machinery and equipment or tangible personal property used by a contractor in performing a contract. D. The following shall be deducted in computing the purchase price of electricity by a retail electric customer from a utility business: 1. Revenues received from sales of ancillary services, electric distribution services, electric generation services, electric transmission services and other services related to providing electricity to a retail electric customer who is located outside this state for use outside this state if the electricity is delivered to a point of sale outside this state. 2. Revenues received from providing electricity, including ancillary services, electric distribution services, electric generation services, electric transmission services and other services related to providing electricity with respect to which the transaction privilege tax imposed under section 42-5063 has been paid. E. The tax levied by this article does not apply to the purchase of solar energy devices from a retailer that is registered with the department as a solar energy retailer or a solar energy contractor. F. The following shall be deducted in computing the purchase price of electricity by a retail electric customer from a utility business: 1. Fees charged by a municipally owned utility to persons constructing residential, commercial or industrial developments or connecting residential, commercial or industrial developments to a municipal utility system or systems if the fees are segregated and used only for capital expansion, system enlargement or debt service of the utility system or systems. 2. Reimbursement or contribution compensation to any person or persons owning a utility system for property and equipment installed to provide utility access to, on or across the land of an actual utility consumer if the property and equipment become the property of the utility. This deduction shall not exceed the value of such property and equipment. G. The tax levied by this article does not apply to the purchase price of electricity, natural gas or liquefied petroleum gas by: 1. A qualified manufacturing or smelting business. A utility that claims this deduction shall report each month, on a form prescribed by the department, the name and address of each qualified manufacturing or smelting business for which this deduction is taken. This paragraph applies to gas transportation services. For the purposes of this paragraph: (a) "Gas transportation services" means the services of transporting natural gas to a natural gas customer or to a natural gas distribution facility if the natural gas was purchased from a supplier other than the utility. (b) "Manufacturing" means the performance as a business of an integrated series of operations that places tangible personal property in a form, composition or character different from that in which it was acquired and transforms it into a different product with a distinctive name, character or use. Manufacturing does not include job printing, publishing, packaging, mining, generating electricity or operating a restaurant. (c) "Qualified manufacturing or smelting business" means one of the following: (i) A business that manufactures or smelts tangible products in this state, of which at least fifty-one percent of the manufactured or smelted products will be exported out of state for incorporation into another product or sold out of state for a final sale. (ii) A business that derives at least fifty-one percent of its gross income from the sale of manufactured or smelted products manufactured or smelted by the business. (iii) A business that uses at least fifty-one percent of its square footage in this state for manufacturing or smelting and business activities directly related to manufacturing or smelting. (iv) A business that employs at least fifty-one percent of its workforce in this state in manufacturing or smelting and business activities directly related to manufacturing or smelting. (v) A business that uses at least fifty-one percent of the value of its capitalized assets in this state, as reflected on the business's books and records, for manufacturing or smelting and business activities directly related to manufacturing or smelting. (d) "Smelting" means to melt or fuse a metalliferous mineral, often with an accompanying chemical change, usually to separate the metal. 2. A business that operates an international operations center in this state and that is certified by the Arizona commerce authority pursuant to section 41-1520. H. A city or town may exempt proceeds from sales of paintings, sculptures or similar works of fine art if such works of fine art are sold by the original artist. For the purposes of this subsection, fine art does not include an art creation such as jewelry, macrame, glasswork, pottery, woodwork, metalwork, furniture or clothing if the art creation has a dual purpose, both aesthetic and utilitarian, whether sold by the artist or by another person. I. For the purposes of subsection B of this section: 1. "Agricultural aircraft" means an aircraft that is built for agricultural use for the aerial application of pesticides or fertilizer or for aerial seeding. 2. "Aircraft" includes: (a) An airplane flight simulator that is approved by the federal aviation administration for use as a phase II or higher flight simulator under appendix H, 14 Code of Federal Regulations part 121. (b) Tangible personal property that is permanently affixed or attached as a component part of an aircraft that is owned or operated by a certificated or licensed carrier of persons or property. 3. "Other accessories and related equipment" includes aircraft accessories and equipment such as ground service equipment that physically contact aircraft at some point during the overall carrier operation. J. For the purposes of subsection D of this section, "ancillary services", "electric distribution service", "electric generation service", "electric transmission service" and "other services" have the same meanings prescribed in section 42-5063.END_STATUTE Sec. 13. Repeal Section 42-5159, Arizona Revised Statutes, as amended by Laws 2025, chapter 251, section 13, is repealed. Sec. 14. Repeal Sections 42-6009 and 42-6013, Arizona Revised Statutes, are repealed. Sec. 15. Section 42-6102, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE42-6102. Administration; exception A. Unless the context otherwise requires, chapter 5, article 1 of this title governs the administration of the taxes imposed by this article, except that: 1. A separate license is not required for the taxes imposed by this article, and the taxes due under this article shall be included, reported and paid with the transaction privilege tax. 2. A separate bond is not required of employees of the department in administering this article. 3. The taxes imposed by this article may be included without segregation in any notice and lien filed for unpaid transaction privilege taxes. B. The taxes imposed pursuant to this article do not apply to the gross proceeds of sales or gross income derived pursuant to contracts entered into before the date of the election to authorize the tax by prime contractors and owner builders who are classified under sections section 42-5075 and 42-5076 unless the contract contains a provision which that entitles the contractor to recover the amount of the tax from a purchaser.  In order to qualify for this exemption the contractor shall provide sufficient documentation, in a manner and form prescribed by the department, to verify that a contract was entered into before the date of the election to authorize the tax. END_STATUTE Sec. 16. Section 42-6108, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE42-6108. Tax on hotels A. The board of supervisors of a county having a population of less than two million five hundred thousand but more than five hundred thousand persons may levy and, if levied, the department shall collect a tax on the gross proceeds of sales or gross income from the business of every person engaging or continuing in the county in a business taxed under chapter 5 of this title and classified under section 42-5070 or 42-5076. The tax shall be levied under this section beginning January 1 or July 1, whichever date first occurs at least three months after the county resolution approving the tax levy. The rate of tax shall not exceed six per cent percent. B. The tax only applies in unincorporated areas of the county. C. At the end of each month the state treasurer shall transmit the net revenues collected pursuant to this section to the treasurer of the county levying the tax.  The county shall use: 1. Not more than thirty-four percent of these revenues for the purposes set forth in section 48-4204, subsection A, as financial participation by the county as required by that subsection. 2. Not more than sixteen percent of these revenues for the purposes of economic development under section 11-254.04.  Any increase in tax imposed under this section shall not constitute a new tax for the purposes of section 11-254.04, subsection B. 3. All remaining revenues to promote and enhance tourism through the recognized tourism promotion agency in the county. END_STATUTE Sec. 17. Section 42-6108.01, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE42-6108.01. Tax on hotels A. The qualified electors residing in a county having a population of less than two million but more than five hundred thousand persons, by majority vote at an election held in the county, may levy and, if levied, the department of revenue shall collect a tax on the gross proceeds of sales or gross income from the business of every person engaging or continuing in a business taxed under chapter 5 of this title and classified under section 42-5070 or 42-5076 within the county.  A tax under this section: 1. Is in addition to taxes imposed by chapter 5 of this title and section 42-6108 and any tax imposed by a city or town in the county. 2. Applies in both incorporated and unincorporated areas of the county. B. If levied, the tax shall be levied under this section beginning on the first day of the first month beginning ninety days after the election to levy the tax.  The tax shall be in effect for thirty years.  The tax may be extended by majority vote of the qualified electors residing in the county at an election held in the county for a period of not more than ten years. C. The rate of the tax is one per cent percent of the tax base prescribed by section 42-5070 or 42-5076. D. Each month the state treasurer shall credit the net revenues collected pursuant to this section to the tourism fund established by section 41-2306. END_STATUTE Sec. 18. Section 42-12003, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE42-12003. Class three property; definition A. For the purposes of taxation, class three is established consisting of: 1. Real and personal property and improvements to the property that are used for residential purposes and is occupied by the owner as the owner's primary residence as described in section 42-12053, that are not otherwise included in class one, two, four, six, seven or eight and that are valued at full cash value. 2. Real and personal property that is used for residential purposes and occupied by a relative of the owner, as described in section 42-12053, as the relative's primary residence, that is not otherwise included in class one, two, four, six, seven or eight and that is valued at full cash value. 3. Real and personal property that is used for residential purposes and occupied by the owner as the owner's primary residence, as described in section 42-12053, who also uses the property for lease or rent to lodgers. B. For the purposes of this section, a homesite that is included in class three may include: 1. Up to ten acres on a single parcel of real property on which the residential improvement is located. 2. More than ten, but not more than forty, acres on a single parcel of real property on which the residential improvement is located if it is zoned exclusively for residential purposes or contains legal restrictions or physical conditions that prevent the division of the parcel. C. For the purposes of this section, "physical conditions" means topography, mountains, washes, rivers, roads or any other configuration that limits the residential usable land area. END_STATUTE Sec. 19. Section 42-12004, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE42-12004. Class four property A. For the purposes of taxation, class four is established consisting of: 1. Real and personal property and improvements to the property that are used for residential purposes, including residential property that is owned in foreclosure by a financial institution, that is not otherwise included in another classification and that is valued at full cash value.  The homesite that is included in class four may include: (a) Up to ten acres on a single parcel of real property on which the residential improvement is located. (b) More than ten, but not more than forty, acres on a single parcel of real property on which the residential improvement is located if it is zoned exclusively for residential purposes or contains legal restrictions or physical conditions that prevent the division of the parcel. For the purposes of this subdivision, "physical conditions" means topography, mountains, washes, rivers, roads or any other configuration that limits the residential usable land area. 2. Real and personal property and improvements to the property that are used for residential purposes and solely leased or rented, that are not included in class one, two, three, six, seven or eight and that are valued at full cash value. 3. Child care facilities that are licensed under title 36, chapter 7.1 and that are valued at full cash value. 4. Real and personal property and improvements to property that are used to operate nonprofit residential housing facilities that are structured to house or care for persons with disabilities or who are at least sixty-two years of age and that are valued at full cash value. 5. Real and personal property and improvements that are used to operate licensed residential care institutions or licensed nursing care institutions that provide medical services, nursing services or health-related services and that are structured to house or care for persons with disabilities or who are at least sixty-two years of age and that are valued at full cash value. 6. Real and personal property consisting of not more than eight rooms of residential property that are leased or rented to transient lodgers, together with furnishing not more than a breakfast meal, by the owner who resides on the property and that is valued at full cash value. 7. Real and personal property that consists of residential dwellings maintained for occupancy by agricultural employees as a condition of employment or as a convenience to the employer, that is not included in class three and that is valued at full cash value. The land associated with these dwellings shall be valued as agricultural land pursuant to chapter 13, article 3 of this title. 8. Real property and improvements to property constituting common areas that are valued pursuant to chapter 13, article 9 of this title. 9. Real and personal property that is defined as timeshare property by section 32-2197 and valued pursuant to chapter 13, article 10 of this title, except for any property used for commercial, industrial or transient occupancy purposes and included in class one to the extent of that use. 10. Real and personal property and improvements that are used for residential purposes and that are leased or rented to lodgers, except for: (a) Property occupied by the owner of the property as the owner's primary residence and included in class three. (b) Property used for commercial purposes and included in class one. 11. 10. Low-income multifamily residential rental properties that are valued pursuant to chapter 13, article 13 of this title. 12. 11. Real and personal property and improvements to property of a guest ranch that meets the requirements prescribed in chapter 13, article 12 of this title and that is included in the Arizona dude ranch heritage trail program established by section 41-867 and that are valued at full cash value. B. Subsection A, paragraphs 4 and 5 of this section do not limit eligibility for exemption from taxation under chapter 11, article 3 of this title. END_STATUTE